AVIATION  SECURITY:  REVIEWING  THE 

RECOMMENDATIONS  OF  THE  9/11  COMMISSION

S.  HRG.  110–117

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

JANUARY  17,  2007

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

35–812 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2007

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

MARGARET SPRING,  Democratic  General  Counsel 
LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on January 17, 2007 .........................................................................
Statement of Senator Carper ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lott ......................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Rockefeller ...........................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Thune ...................................................................................

Hawley, Hon. Edmund S. ‘‘Kip’’, Assistant Secretary, Transportation Security 
Administration, Department of Homeland Security .........................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

APPENDIX 

Coyne, James K., President, National Air Transportation Association (NATA), 
letter  dated  January  17,  2007,  to  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye  and  Hon.  Ted 
Stevens ..................................................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Hon.  Edmund  S.  ‘‘Kip’’  Hawley 

by: 

Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg ...............................................................................

Page 
1
33
1
2
15
19
21
26
17
1
2
1
14
23

4
5

39

40
52

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

AVIATION 

SECURITY: 

RECOMMENDATIONS 
COMMISSION 

REVIEWING 
OF 
THE 

THE
9/11

WEDNESDAY,  JANUARY  17,  2007

SENATE COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND 
TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building.  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. I apologize for my delay here, but this is our first 
meeting  of  the  Commerce  Committee  and  I  think  it  is  significant 
that we begin with the tragic moment of this decade, 9/11. And I’d 
like to welcome all of you here. 

And I’d like to announce, now, that this committee has no Rank-
ing  Member,  it  has  a  Vice  Chairman,  with  all  the  prerogatives  of 
the Chairman. 

Mr. Chairman, it’s your show. Want to say something? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  guess  we  should  go 
through  the  traditional  handing  of  the  gavel,  but  it  makes  no  dif-
ference, as far as I’m concerned, who’s Chairman. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, thank you. 
[Applause.] 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Mr. Chairman, if you wish me to proceed, 
what I’d like to start off by doing is recognizing that we are graced 
by  the  presence  of  three  new  people  on  our  full  Committee.  And 
one is Senator Carper, who is not here, but who was born in West 
Virginia;  the  second  is  Senator  Claire  McCaskill,  who  is  going  to 
be an absolutely superb member of this committee, and I hope she 
enjoys  it  as  much  as  we’ll  enjoy  working  with  her;  and  the  other 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2

is  Senator  Amy  Klobuchar,  from  Minnesota,  and  she’s  going  to  be 
a terrific member, too. So, I just wanted to say that. 

I would also suggest, Mr. Full-Committee Chairman, that we not 
have  statements—I  won’t  make  a  statement,  I’ll  just  put  it  in  the 
record—and  that  we  go  right  to  Mr.  Hawley—Secretary  Hawley, 
that we go to you and have you give your statement, and then we’ll 
follow with questions, if that’s all right. 

[The prepared statements of Senators Rockefeller and Inouye fol-

low:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WEST VIRGINIA 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for calling this very important hearing, and for shining 
a light on the crucial legislation a number of us cosponsored and introduced earlier 
this month, S. 184, the Surface Transportation and Rail Security Act of 2007, or the 
STARS Act. 

We  know  that  we  are  a  nation  with  enemies,  and  we  know  that  because  of  our 
freedoms and our economy, we are a nation of targets. In the years since terrorists 
used  one  mode  of  transportation  to  wake  us  up  to  their  sick  motivations  and  evil 
designs, we have made strides to protect the people and assets associated with that 
mode,  aviation.  Despite  the  good,  bipartisan  work  by  this  committee  in  the  years 
since  September  11th  to  address  the  vulnerabilities  of  our  passenger  and  freight 
rails, our ports and waterway facilities, and other elements of our transportation in-
frastructure, I am afraid that some in Congress and in the Administration have not 
been as diligent in protecting these other modes. 

If  we  are  to  take  our  responsibilities  as  Members  of  Congress  seriously,  we  must 
make certain that the trucks, trains, pipelines, and barges carrying hazardous mate-
rials  are  made  secure.  We  must  demand  action  to  protect  our  passenger  rail  and 
transit  systems  so  that  the  tragedies  we  have  witnessed  in  Madrid,  London,  and 
Mumbai  are  not  replayed  here.  We  must  do  what  we  can  to  protect  our  transpor-
tation  systems  from  evil  motives  and  opportunities  that  we  would  never  have 
thought to imagine just a few years ago. 

It  is  important  for  these  witnesses  to  be  heard  before  this  committee,  and  it  is 
even  more  important  for  the  Committee  to  take  quick  action  on  the  STARS  Act.  I 
look  forward  to  voting  it  out  of  Committee,  and  anticipate  its  timely  consideration 
by the full Senate. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
As  we  embark  on  the  first  hearing  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation  in  the  110th  Congress,  I  wish  to  welcome  the  new  members  to  the 
Commerce Committee:

Senator Tom Carper of Delaware; 
Senator Claire McCaskill of Missouri; 
Senator Amy Klobuchar of Minnesota; and 
Senator John Thune of South Dakota.

I would also like to recognize my Vice Chairman, Senator Ted Stevens. I look for-
ward  to  our  continued  partnership  to  address  issues  of  importance  to  our  Nation. 
The  members  of  this  committee  have  much  work  to  accomplish  over  the  coming 

weeks and months. I am confident this can be done in a bipartisan fashion. 

Among  other  priorities,  we  need  to  ensure  the  security  of  all  transportation 
modes.  This  Committee  was  instrumental  in  developing  legislation  to  secure  avia-
tion  and  port  infrastructure,  but  we  must  complete  our  work  to  secure  the  other 
modes of surface transportation including rail. In addition to tackling new transpor-
tation security threats through legislative initiatives, we have a duty to provide the 
necessary  oversight  on  the  implementation  of  security  measures  we  mandated  as 
long ago as 5 years and as recent as this past October. 

In  addition,  this  committee  must  effectively  assert  its  jurisdiction  to  protect  and 
improve  both  our  energy  and  environmental  security  through  technological  innova-
tion that will increase fuel efficiency and encourage the development of alternative, 
clean-burning fuels, and reduce the production of greenhouse gases. 

Further, ‘‘science’’ is our middle name and we must ensure that the scientists who 
study the issues within this committee’s jurisdiction receive the resources their work 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3

deserves and the opportunity to communicate their results to the public so that Con-
gress can make its decisions with the best information possible. 

As the communications policy and technology committee, we must work to encour-
age  innovation,  competition,  and  competitiveness,  and  ensure  that  all  Americans 
share in the benefits of technological advancements. 

I  look  forward  to  working  collaboratively  with  the  members  of  this  committee  as 

we tackle these, and other important issues. 

On  a  few  matters  of  ‘‘housekeeping,’’  for  full  Committee  hearings  which  will  be 
chaired  by  me,  I  would  like  to  continue  the  procedure  for  opening  statements  and 
member  questions  that  Senator  Stevens  and  I  adopted  last  year.  Under  this  proce-
dure,  Senators  will  be  allotted  7  minutes  for  the  first  round  of  questions,  up  to  2 
minutes of which may be used for a brief opening statement. 

If  time  permits,  at  the  discretion  of  the  chair,  members  may  ask  a  second  round 
of  questions.  This  will  ensure  that  all  our  witnesses  have  as  much  time  to  answer 
questions as we can provide them. 

Subcommittee  Chairs  may  establish  their  own  opening  statement  and  question 

procedures for subcommittee hearings as the circumstances warrant. 

On another matter of ‘‘housekeeping,’’ as the Chairman of the Committee with ju-
risdiction  over  technology  and  communications  it  may  seem  inappropriate,  but  I 
would  be  most  appreciative  if  during  hearings  members  would  minimize  the  use  of 
BlackBerry devices and cell phones, as a courtesy to the witnesses. 

With  respect  to  this  morning’s  hearing,  Senator  Rockefeller,  who  will  be  chairing 
the Aviation Operations, Safety, and Security Subcommittee, has great expertise in 
this  area  with  his  background  on  this  committee,  the  Intelligence  Committee,  and 
the Finance Committee. I appreciate his chairing this hearing today. 

I will submit the remainder of my statement for the record so that we can quickly 

move to our witness and allow ample opportunity for members to ask questions. 

I  recognize  my  Vice  Chairman,  Senator  Stevens,  for  any  remarks  he  would  like 

to make before I turn the gavel over to Senator Rockefeller. 

Our  nation  has  taken  many  important  steps  that  have  strengthened  the  security 
of  our  transportation  system  over  the  past  5  years.  This  is  particularly  true  of  the 
domestic  aviation  industry.  Both  the  government  and  private  sectors  have  made  a 
tremendous  investment  to  develop  a  layered  security  regime  in  which  the  vast  ma-
jority of the traveling public has confidence. 

In fact, more Americans flew last year than any other year in the history of com-
mercial  aviation,  and  as  potential  threats  arise,  the  security  system  has  proven  to 
be  flexible  enough  to  keep  passengers  flowing  while  remaining  responsive  to  secu-
rity challenges. 

Despite  our  efforts  to  ensure  the  security  of  the  aviation  system  in  the  United 
States, more needs to be done to address ongoing threats. The bipartisan 9/11 Com-
mission  provided  a  valuable  public  service  by  making  recommendations  on  how  to 
ensure against a repeat of the events of September 11, 2001. They identified several 
key  shortcomings  in  our  aviation  security  system,  including  the  process  for  cargo 
and  baggage  screening,  checkpoint  screening 
for  explosives  and  passenger 
prescreening.  Each  of  these  weaknesses,  if  unaddressed,  offers  an  opportunity  for 
our enemies to launch a potentially devastating attack. 

The  development  of  an  advanced  passenger  prescreening  system,  a  vital  compo-
nent  of  our  security  system,  has  been  delayed  for  several  years.  That  is  too  long. 
The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  needs  to  move  forward  with 
this  system,  to  strengthen  aviation  security  while  protecting  the  civil  rights  of  all 
Americans.  The  installation  of  integrated  or  ‘‘in-line’’  Explosive  Detection  Systems 
(EDS)  will  not  be  completed  for  more  than  a  decade  if  deployment  continues  at  its 
current pace. Again, this is too long given the economic and operational benefits this 
system provides. We must speed up this process. 

In  addition,  the  TSA  must  address  the  security  of  all  cargo  going  on  passenger 
aircraft. The TSA must work with Congress to make certain extensive screening be-
comes a reality in the near term. 

This summer’s foiled plot to target U.S. and British air carriers with liquid explo-
sives has shown both the successes of our overall security efforts, as well as our re-
maining  weaknesses.  Intelligence  was  vital  in  stopping  that  attack  at  the  planning 
stages, but we can only guess how the security regime would have responded if the 
plot had been put in motion. It was a stark reminder of the continual efforts of our 
enemies,  and  the  continual  resolve  we  must  have  to  secure  our  citizens  and  our 
economy against their efforts. 

It  is  critical  that  this  committee  work  with  the  Administration,  the  public,  and 
the aviation industry to improve the existing system of security and fix any remain-
ing  problems.  We  must  both  ensure  the  integrity  of  our  security  system,  and  keep 
the country’s vital economic engine functioning efficiently.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4

STATEMENT  OF  HON.  EDMUND 

‘‘KIP’’  HAWLEY,
ASSISTANT  SECRETARY,  TRANSPORTATION  SECURITY
ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Mr. HAWLEY. Thank you Mr. Chairman, Mr. Vice Chairman and 

S. 

members of the Committee. 

When I last appeared before this committee, we had a very direct 
conversation  about  Secure  Flight,  TSA’s  watch-list  matching  pro-
gram.  I  announced  at  that  time  that  I  directed  a  re-baselining  of 
the  program  to  assure  that  it  meets  our  stringent  privacy  require-
ments.  That  work  is  now  complete,  and  we  are  moving  forward  to 
start implementation of Secure Flight next year. 

It is important to note that watch-list matching of known terror-
ists  with  passenger  lists  is  not  on  hold  while  waiting  for  Secure 
Flight.  That  process  works  well  today  and  will  continue  until  we 
are sure that Secure Flight is fully ready. 

To  assure  the  accuracy  of  the  No  Fly  List  itself,  we  will  shortly 
conclude  a  case-by-case  review  of  every  name  on  the  No  Fly  List. 
Working  with  our  partners  at  the  Terrorist  Screening  Center  and 
in the intelligence community and law enforcement, this effort will 
effectively cut the No Fly List in half. 

Of  course,  TSA’s  most  visible  presence  is  at  the  airports.  On  the 
morning  of  August  10th,  about  a  month  short  of  the  fifth  anniver-
sary of 9/11, we had an unscheduled, real-world test of TSA, in par-
ticular, and aviation security, overall. 

TSA,  in  just  a  few  hours—literally  overnight—rolled  out  a  new 
checkpoint  security  process  for  every  passenger  in  America.  Also, 
TSA put these changes into effect worldwide for every flight bound 
for  the  United  States,  and  deployed  Federal  Air  Marshal  teams  to 
saturate affected flights flown by U.S. carriers. 

For  TSA,  August  10th  represents  both  an  affirmation  of  how  far 
we’ve  come  in  5  years  and  gives  us  confidence  in  the  path  ahead. 
I’m  proud  of  the  way  TSA  men  and  women,  including  Federal  Air 
Marshals,  stepped  up  to  this  challenge,  and  of  their  commitment 
to our mission going forward. 

August 10th also illustrates how some of the security layers that 
I  have  mentioned  in  previous  testimony  work  in  a  live-fire  situa-
tion. 

The first layer I identified was working with our partners in the 
intelligence  community,  law  enforcement,  and  the  military,  others 
at DHS, and elsewhere in the U.S. Government, to identify and act 
on  the  threat  at  its  origin.  That  happened  in  August,  and  the  co-
ordinated  actions  across  the  Government  gave  us,  at  TSA,  key, 
timely information that enabled us to stay ahead of the threat. 

TSA  does  not  act  alone.  Airports  and  airlines  work  alongside 
TSA  every  day.  I  cannot  express,  enough,  my  appreciation  for  the 
job they did this summer. We were all on the same page and acted 
together in a coordinated and sustained effort. 

The  same  thing  can  be  said  for  our  international  partners.  We 
worked  together  to  put  in  place  what  has  become  an  ICAO-rec-
ommended  practice  worldwide,  and  is  enforced  today  throughout 
the European Union, Canada, and Australia. Connecting with part-
ners  in  the  U.S.  Government  in  the  aviation  industry,  and  with 
government  entities  around  the  world,  is  a  vital  part  of  our  secu-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5

rity system and does not happen by accident. At TSA, building and 
practicing these connections is a core function of the agency. 

I’ve  testified  before  this  committee  on  a  number  of  occasions 
about the importance of taking full advantage of our existing work-
force, and of recognizing that the human mind itself is the most ad-
vanced technology on Earth. 

As  you  know,  we’ve  put  a  major  focus  on  sophisticated  and  con-
tinued  training  of  our  Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSOs)  in 
detecting  improvised  explosion  device  (IED)  components.  Beyond 
IED training, we have developed advanced capabilities in behavior 
observation,  bomb  appraisal,  and  document  verification.  We  have 
also made a major investment in our workforce to retain and moti-
vate  the  best  security  officers.  Our  work  over  the  last  year  has  re-
sulted  in  significant  reductions  in  old  problem  areas,  like  attrition 
and injuries. 

For the first time, TSOs have significant long-term career oppor-
tunities,  as  well  as  pay  increases  for  excellent  performance.  The 
impact of this renewed focus on mission performance and our TSOs 
is that we have an engaged workforce that is well-trained and mo-
tivated.  I  think  you  can  feel  it  at  checkpoints  around  the  country. 
The  challenge  in  August  was  unplanned,  but  it  was  not  unex-
pected. We will continue to be challenged, and have to be prepared 
for  the  unknown  new  threat,  as  well  as  address  all  the  known 
threats.  This  puts  a  priority  on  layers  of  security  that  are  flexible, 
connected, and cannot be engineered around. 

So,  even  as  we  continue  to  deploy  technology,  we  must  also  con-
tinue  to  invest  in  our  workforce  and  take  advantage  of  the  unique 
asset  that  it  represents.  Every  day,  all  across  the  country,  there 
are  thousands  of  TSOs,  inspectors,  and  Federal  Air  Marshals  who, 
on  a  moment’s  notice,  can  and  do  deploy  anywhere  in  an  airport 
or the world. 

Our  mission  is  security,  and  we  never  forget  that.  To  meet  an 
adaptive  enemy  whom  we  cannot  always  predict,  there  is  no  sub-
stitute for alert and prepared people. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear today, and I’d be happy 

to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hawley follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY, ASSISTANT SECRETARY, 
TRANSPORTATION SECURITY ADMINISTRATION, DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND SECURITY 
Good morning Chairman Inouye, Vice Chairman Stevens, and distinguished mem-
bers of the Committee. Thank you for this opportunity to speak with you about the 
progress the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) has made in fulfilling the rec-
ommendations of the 9/11 Commission related to aviation security. 

First,  I  would  like  to  thank  the  Committee  for  the  tremendous  support  given  to 
DHS  and  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  over  the  past  year,  es-
pecially as we have sharpened our focus on explosives at the passenger checkpoint. 
We look forward to continuing our partnership on these and other issues in the com-
ing year. 

2006  was  a  demanding  year  for  TSA,  and  its  partners  in  aviation  security  gen-
erally,  but  it  ultimately  has  demonstrated  how  far  we  have  come  in  securing  our 
Nation’s  transportation  systems  since  the  9/11  Commission  issued  its  report  and 
recommendations. 

While  last  year  is  most  notable  for  the  activities  related  to  the  liquid  explosives 
plot,  I  would  like  to  highlight  for  the  Committee  several  initiatives  that  helped  us 
prepare  to  meet  that  and  other  security  challenges  as  well  as  the  challenge  pre-
sented by increased passenger loads. Last year we discussed our need to focus more 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6

on  the  threat  of  improvised  explosive  devices  (IEDs)  at  the  passenger  checkpoint. 
We knew that, while technology is a key component of our security strategy, we had 
opportunities  to  increase  security  by  better  enabling  our  workforce,  specifically  our 
Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSOs).  I  will  discuss  some  examples  later  in  my 
testimony, but the efforts were centered around training and retaining our best peo-
ple, giving them financial and career progression incentives, and expanding opportu-
nities for more advanced security skills like behavior observation. 

While  those  efforts  were  underway,  TSA,  anticipating  increased  summer  pas-
senger  loads,  changed  the  way  it  hires  new  employees  from  a  centrally  operated 
headquarters  model  to  one  where  the  local  airport  team  managed  its  own  hiring. 
This  transition  was  complete  in  time  to  staff  the  Memorial  Day  to  Labor  Day  peak 
summer travel period. 

In  the  weeks  before  Memorial  Day,  there  was  concern  about  TSA’s  new  staffing 
model  and  the  agency’s  readiness  to  handle  the  summer  traffic.  The  liquids  ban  in 
August raised issues about large scale cancellation of flights due to security delays. 
Our ‘‘3–1–1’’ security procedures, which allow passengers to bring onto planes small 
quantities of liquids that do not represent a significant security risk, were controver-
sial,  and  many  felt  that  the  Thanksgiving  holidays  would  be  affected  by  security 
delays.  But  TSA,  airlines,  airports,  and  passengers  were  ready  for  the  summer, 
flights were not canceled as a result of the liquids ban, and all handled the holiday 
travel season without incident. 

Similarly,  TSA’s  Federal  Air  Marshals  Service  (FAMS)  put  forth  major  efforts  at 
improving  its  operating  procedures  to  better  retain  Federal  Air  Marshals  (FAMs) 
and  improve  TSA’s  ability  to  quickly  support  emergent  circumstances  that  might 
occur  anywhere  in  the  world.  Examples  of  these  efforts  include  the  comprehensive 
listening  and  employee  involvement  initiatives  that  resulted  in  more  flexible  dress 
code and travel requirements, as well as the FAMS support of the emergency evacu-
ation of U.S. citizens from Lebanon. 

The  value  of  a  fully-staffed,  fully-prepared,  and  actively  engaged  TSA  front-line 
workforce,  be  they  TSOs  or  FAMs,  was  made  evident  most  dramatically  in  TSA’s 
response  to  the  discovery  in  the  United  Kingdom  of  a  plot  to  use  liquid  explosives 
to  take  down  passenger  aircraft  bound  for  the  United  States.  TSA  acted  decisively 
and  swiftly  to  protect  the  traveling  public.  Literally  overnight,  our  dedicated  TSOs 
implemented major new screening protocols to focus on and protect against the im-
minent threat. FAMs moved, in the hundreds, to conduct missions of unprecedented 
tempo  and  complexity  to  combat  the  threat  and  instill  confidence  in  the  security  of 
commercial  aviation.  The  support  of  our  partners  in  the  airports  and  airlines,  as 
well as the cooperation of the traveling public, was invaluable in achieving this suc-
cess. All of us can be proud of the fact that while this was enormous change, imple-
mented  on  an  emergency  basis,  the  U.S.  aviation  system  continued  to  function—
that,  even  though  there  were  security  delays  in  the  first  few  days  of  the  new  proc-
ess,  the  system  operated  smoothly  from  August  right  through  the  recent  holidays. 
In this regard, we would emphasize that TSA’s ability to deal effectively with the 
liquids  plot,  as  well  as  its  ability  to  assist  with  the  impact  of  Hurricane  Katrina, 
depended  upon  TSA’s  flexible  personnel  management  authorities  established  in  the 
Aviation  and  Transportation  Security  Act  (ATSA).  These  authorities  permit  TSA  to 
flexibly  manage  and  deploy  its  workforce,  including  its  TSO  workforce,  in  carrying 
out  important  security  work  directly  affecting  national  security.  During  Hurricane 
Katrina  and  after  the  United  Kingdom  air  bombing  plot  was  foiled,  TSA  changed 
the  nature  of  employees’  work—and  even  the  location  of  their  work—to  flexibly  re-
spond  to  these  emergencies.  Similarly,  FAMs  were  redeployed  on  hours’  notice  to 
support  the  evacuation  of  U.S.  citizens  from  Lebanon.  This  flexibility  is  a  key  com-
ponent  of  how  DHS,  through  TSA,  protects  Americans  while  they  travel.  For  these 
reasons  we  would  strongly  oppose  any  legislative  proposal  that  would  diminish  the 
authority that this committee gave to us in ATSA. 

It is also important to note that our partners in other countries around the globe 
stepped  up  in  a  major  way  to  implement  the  new  protocols  that  we  instituted  with 
necessarily short notice. The communications efforts that followed the emergency ac-
tions  resulted  in  unprecedented  advanced  harmonization  of  security  measures  that 
subsequently  resulted  in  nearly  identical  measures  for  the  United  States,  Canada, 
the entire European Union, and Australia, as well as adoption by the International 
Civil Aviation Organization (ICAO) of a world-wide recommended practice reflecting 
the same procedures. 

We  have  learned  a  great  deal  since  the  9/11  Commission  released  its  findings 
about  the  nature  of  the  terrorist  threat  today  and  about  the  best  ways  to  use  the 
tools  at  our  disposal  to  deal  with  that  threat.  Our  experience  teaches  us  that  the 
9/11  Commission  recommendations  can  be  most  effective  when  applied  in  the  con-
text  of  the  constantly  changing  world  in  which  we  operate.  They  inform  our  path 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7

forward  as  we  integrate  them  with  the  additional  insights  we  have  gained  since 
their publication. 

Since  its  inception,  TSA  has  embraced  the  essential  concept  that  no  single  secu-
rity  strategy  is  foolproof,  but  by  employing  layers  of  security  to  our  mission,  risk 
to our Nation’s transportation system can be mitigated. Our layered approach to se-
curity  utilizes  and  relies  upon  interconnecting  networks  among  our  partners  in  the 
aviation  industry—air  carriers  and  airport  operators;  State  and  local  governments 
and their law enforcement agencies; and other Federal entities including among oth-
ers,  other  DHS  components,  the  FAA,  and  the  Federal  intelligence  community;  as 
well  as  other  nations  allied  with  us  in  the  fight  against  terrorism.  Our  layered  ap-
proach utilizes technology and, more importantly, depends upon the skills and dedi-
cation of our TSOs. 

We  have  learned  that  the  most  visible  part  of  our  aviation  security  mission,  the 
screening  of  passengers  and  property  at  the  airport,  is  but  a  part  of  our  arsenal 
against terrorism. We cannot focus on a ‘‘catch them in the act’’ strategy that waits 
until  a  person  tries  to  board  an  aircraft  with  a  weapon.  No  matter  how  good  our 
screening  is,  and  how  sophisticated  our  technology  is,  our  success  is  greatly  im-
proved  with  our  ability  to  anticipate  the  terrorist  act  and  thwart  it  well  before  it 
gets  off  the  ground.  This  was  demonstrated  not  only  by  the  timely  investigation, 
revelation, and frustration of the British liquid explosives plot, but also by the early 
disruption of a plot to attack tunnels under New York’s Hudson River. 
Our People 

Most  importantly,  we  know  that  our  mission  cannot  be  achieved  with  a  checklist 
mentality  in  an  assembly-line  environment.  Our  people  are  the  most  critical  asset 
in  our  mission  of  securing  the  Nation’s  transportation  systems.  No  existing  tech-
nology can provide a fully-automated approach, and even with extensive use of tech-
nology, we will always need the critical thinking skills of people to adapt to emerg-
ing threats. 

The introduction of several new programs focuses on developing specialized skills 
in  our  workforce.  TSA  has  implemented  a  behavior  observation  and  analysis  pro-
gram,  called  Screening  of  Passengers  by  Observation  Techniques  (SPOT),  designed 
to  provide  TSA  Behavior  Detection  Officers  (BDOs)  with  a  non-intrusive  means  of 
identifying potentially high-risk individuals. The program was developed and imple-
mented  to  observe  normal  passenger  characteristics  and  anxieties  and  identify 
anomalies  to  detect  individuals  who  may  be  a  threat  to  aviation  and/or  transpor-
tation security. SPOT is also part of a larger effort by the agency to add more layers 
of  security  to  protect  against  those  individuals  seeking  to  defeat  our  security  sys-
tems. 

TSA has also implemented the Bomb Appraisal Officer (BAO) program to prevent 
the  introduction  of  explosives  and  IEDs  from  entering  the  aviation  system.  The 
BAOs are trained bomb technicians who provide advanced training for the workforce 
and resolve alarms that are beyond the TSO workforce capability. 

TSA  continues  to  develop  and  refine  our  plans  relating  to  document-checking, 
whereby specially trained TSOs examine boarding documents to detect and deter in-
dividuals  attempting  to  board  aircraft  fraudulently.  This  interaction  with  pas-
sengers also gives these TSOs an additional opportunity to observe behavioral char-
acteristics  of  passengers  and  identify  anomalies  that  would  warrant  additional 
screening, augmenting other security programs such as SPOT. 

TSA also continues to add elements of randomness and unpredictability to the air-
port security environment to prevent terrorists from committing terrorist or harmful 
acts. 

Our  mission  success  therefore  depends  on  recruiting  and  keeping  trusted,  bright, 
well-motivated,  well-trained  people  who  have  the  right  tools,  work  in  a  positive, 
team-driven environment, and are involved and challenged by their work. Our work 
force  must  be  rewarded  by  fair  compensation  and  benefits  and  have  prospects  for 
continued advancement based on their ability and effort. 

To this end, in 2006 we rolled out a comprehensive performance management sys-
tem  for  making  TSA  a  true  performance-based  organization.  Under  this  system, 
TSA  is  now  compensating  its  TSOs  based  upon  their  technical  proficiency,  training 
and  development,  customer  service  skills,  teamwork,  professionalism,  and  leader-
ship. By recognizing and rewarding the right skills and new skills, as well as higher 
proficiency levels, we are reinforcing critical performance areas and developing new 
ones to support the ever-changing needs in security. 

Another critical program introduced in 2006 is the TSO Career Progression initia-
tive.  TSA  is  committed  to  creating  a  career  track  and  advancement  opportunities 
that  will  encourage  not  only  quality  performance,  but  also  longevity  among  our 
TSOs.  This  program  created  new  pay  bands  for  TSOs  and  the  opportunity  to  serve 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8

in  advanced  positions  as  Behavior  Detection  Officers,  who  execute  TSA’s  Screening 
Passengers  by  Observation  Technique  (SPOT)  Program,  BAOs,  and  TSA-Approved 
instructors, who provide a full range of required TSO training. 
Passenger Pre-Screening 

The  focus  on  people  applies  to  those  who  work  at  airports  and  airlines  and  fly 
as  passengers  as  much  as  to  those,  like  TSOs  and  FAMs,  who  provide  security  for 
the system. This topic rightly received considerable attention from the 9/11 Commis-
sion. 

Regarding  passenger  pre-screening,  I  testified  before  this  committee  in  February 
2006  on  the  status  of  Secure  Flight,  TSA’s  watch-list  matching  program,  and  am 
pleased  to  update  the  Committee  in  the  context  of  the  9/11  Commission  rec-
ommendations. 

While we are aware of concerns regarding the effectiveness of the current system 
of  screening  domestic  airline  passengers  against  the  No  Fly  List,  today  any  person 
on  the  No  Fly  List  will  not  fly.  The  No  Fly  List  is  regularly  kept  up  to  date  and 
changes are made as required. Secure Flight, when operational, will bring the proc-
ess  of  comparing  passenger  names  against  the  No  Fly  List,  now  performed  by  air-
craft operators, into the government. That is why I have said that it is more impor-
tant that Secure Flight is built right—with all the needed operational attributes and 
privacy  that  will  withstand  any  challenges.  So  while  I  am  mindful  of  the  urgency 
to  bring  Secure  Flight  into  operation  quickly,  I  am  also  mindful  of  my  obligation 
to the public not to get into a situation where we either have to stop flights or allow 
them to fly without a way to prevent No Flys from boarding. 

TSA  is  firmly  committed  to  protecting  the  privacy  and  civil  liberties  of  travelers. 
After completing a vulnerability assessment of the Secure Flight program and after 
considering  feedback  from  the  Congress  and  the  Government  Accountability  Office 
(GAO),  as  well  as  DHS  evaluations  of  the  program,  I  announced  to  this  committee 
that  TSA  was  re-baselining  the  program.  At  that  time,  we  undertook  this  effort  to 
assure  privacy  and  information  security  in  Secure  Flight  by  making  sure  the  foun-
dation  of  the  program  was  strong  and  that  it  will  be  successful  upon  implementa-
tion. That work has now been completed. 

I am pleased to update you that we are currently working with the DHS Screen-
ing  Coordination  Office  (SCO)  toward  achieving  DHS  certification  and  dem-
onstrating  satisfaction  of  the  ten  areas  of  Congressional  direction  to  GAO.  We  are 
working  closely  with  GAO  to  facilitate  their  review  of  the  program’s  development. 
In  addition,  through  regularly  scheduled  meetings  with  U.S.  Customs  and  Border 
Protection (CBP), we are coordinating airline industry needs with CBP and the air-
lines  with  the  intent  of  providing  a  single  DHS  system  interface  to  the  industry. 
Key to our efforts in improving passenger pre-screening has been the tremendous 
undertaking to systematically review names on the No Fly List. The purpose of the 
review is to remove, or downgrade to the Selectee List, individuals that do not meet 
the  established  criteria  for  the  No  Fly  List.  The  review  implements  new  guidance 
for  the  No  Fly  and  Selectee  Lists  ratified  in  July  2006  by  the  Terrorist  Screening 
Center’s  (TSC)  Governance  Board.  Just  as  the  threat  environment  is  fluid,  so  must 
the  No  Fly  List  be  maintained  as  a  true  list  of  individuals  who  currently  pose  a 
threat, rather than maintaining on the list those who were feared to have presented 
a  threat  in  the  past,  but  no  longer  do.  TSA  and  the  TSC,  in  collaboration  with  all 
the  nominating  agencies  responsible  for  compiling  the  No  Fly  List,  are  in  the  proc-
ess  of  a  thorough,  name-by-name  review  of  that  list.  We  expect  that  by  the  time 
the review is completed in mid-February, the No Fly List should be reduced by ap-
proximately 50 percent. A similar review will be undertaken with respect to the Se-
lectee List. 

Integral  to  the  successful  execution  of  our  passenger  pre-screening  efforts  is  our 
redress  system,  by  which  travelers  who  either  previously  have  been  misidentified 
or  believe  they  are  on  the  No  Fly  or  Selectee  List  in  error  may  apply  to  have  that 
error  corrected.  We  have  significantly  modified  the  process  in  response  to  customer 
feedback  that  the  process  was  too  cumbersome  and  expensive.  Now  an  applicant 
need submit only a single document—a United States Passport—to verify his or her 
identity. Approximately 70 percent of applicants have this document and are there-
fore  able  to  apply  for  relief  without  submitting  other  documentation.  We  have  also 
eliminated the requirement that identity documents be notarized and we allow elec-
tronic submission of the application and supporting documentation. Finally, TSA in-
troduced an automated Redress Management System (RMS). After assuring the pri-
vacy of users and the security of the system, RMS was launched on October 6, 2006, 
enabling travelers to submit and check the status of their applications electronically 
via the Internet. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9

TSA has already seen a dramatic improvement in customer service. TSA received 
and  processed  more  than  20,000  redress  requests  for  calendar  year  2006.  At  the 
same  time,  the  average  processing  time  has  been  reduced  from  60  to  less  than  10 
days.  TSA  is  also  working  with  other  DHS  components  to  bring  to  reality  the  DHS 
Traveler  Redress  Inquiry  Program  (DHS  TRIP),  Secretary  Chertoff’s  and  Secretary 
of State Rice’s joint vision of one-stop redress for travelers. This program would pro-
vide  travelers  with  a  single,  simple  process  for  addressing  Federal  watch-list 
misidentification  issues  and  other  individual  complaints  that  arise  from  the  trav-
eler’s screening experience. 
Explosives Detection Technology 

In  partnership  with  DHS  Science  &  Technology  (S&T)  Directorate,  TSA  benefits 
from  a  robust  research  and  development  program  for  explosives  detection.  TSA  has 
invested  over  $1  billion  to  purchase,  install  and  upgrade  explosives  detection  sys-
tems  at  airports  over  a  three-year  period.  In  Fiscal  Year  2006,  TSA  invested  ap-
proximately  $534  million  in  the  purchase  and  deployment  of  explosives  detection 
technology,  which  included  Next  Generation  technology  and  Letters  of  Intent  (LOI) 
reimbursement. 

DHS  continues  to  move  forward  to  research,  pilot,  and  deploy  additional  check-
point  explosives  detection  technologies.  These  new  technologies  will  be  deployed  as 
soon as their reliability is assured. In the coming weeks, TSA will also begin testing 
x-ray backscatter technology that will be able to detect non-metallic devices and ob-
jects, in addition to metallic weapons and other threat items. 

Consistent with all other elements of security, the integrity of explosives detection 
ultimately  depends  upon  a  well-trained,  dedicated  workforce.  In  the  fall  of  2005, 
TSA  developed  and  rolled-out  advanced  IED  training  for  every  checkpoint  TSO,  in-
cluding  detection  of  liquid  explosives.  More  than  38,000  TSOs  have  completed  this 
training, which has subsequently been reinforced with intensive technical classroom 
training and online improvement training to reinforce explosives detection capabili-
ties. 

TSA  conducts  its  own  explosives  covert  testing  on  our  checkpoints,  and  we  have 
made changes to our protocols to improve passenger screening. We are working with 
GAO to incorporate any lessons learned from their tests in our training and screen-
ing protocols, as well. 
Checked Baggage Screening 

Today  TSA  meets  the  requirement  to  screen  100  percent  of  all  checked  bags  for 
explosives.  Since  the  initial  deployment  of  explosives  detection  systems  (EDS)  and 
explosives  trace  detection  units  (ETDs)  to  screen  checked  baggage  electronically  for 
explosives  after  9/11,  TSA  has  aggressively  pursued  innovation  and  investment  in-
tended  to  dramatically  improve  the  system.  Today,  67  airports  are  either  oper-
ational or deploying some form of advanced in-line baggage screening system. 

In February 2006, TSA delivered to Congress a Strategic Planning Framework for 
the  Electronic  Baggage  Screening  Program  (EBSP).  This  framework  details  TSA’s 
long-term  planning  philosophy  for  the  development  and  implementation  of  optimal 
baggage screening solutions at the Nation’s top 250 airports, where over 99 percent 
of  checked  baggage  originates,  and  currently  guides  TSA’s  investment  and  deploy-
ment  decisions.  The  plan  also  includes  a  funding  prioritization  schedule,  a  deploy-
ment strategy, an EDS life-cycle management plan, and a stakeholder collaboration 
plan. 

TSA,  through  an  Aviation  Security  Advisory  Committee  (ASAC),  has  been  work-
ing separately with aviation industry stakeholders to develop a cost-sharing formula 
and innovative financing solutions for the EBSP, and has been exploring the options 
proposed to expedite the deployment of in-line EDS. This Baggage Screening Invest-
ment Study (BSIS) has been completed and will be provided to Congress in the near 
future. 
Air Cargo Security 

TSA  has  augmented  air  cargo  security  through  a  combination  of  layered  security 
measures,  including  screening  and  vetting,  that  enhance  security  without  unduly 
disrupting the flow of commerce. As part of this effort, TSA is implementing a com-
prehensive  final  regulation  to  strengthen  air  cargo  security  throughout  the  supply 
chain  and  has  issued  targeted  rules  that  set  additional  security  requirements  for 
regulated parties. These rules include: the elimination of all exemptions from cargo 
subject to screening, increasing to 100 percent TSA’s screening of counter-to-counter 
cargo  and  increasing  to  100  percent  TSA’s  screening  of  all  cargo  received  at  Cat-
egory II, III, and IV airports. TSA also targets certain high risk categories of cargo 
for  100  percent  screening,  utilizes  over  396  canine  teams  to  screen  cargo  at  74  of 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10

the  Nation’s  larger  airports,  and  is  requiring  Security  Threat  Assessments  for  all 
supply chain workers with unescorted access to air cargo. 

TSA  vigorously  enforces  these  regulations  and  security  directives  through  inspec-
tions  and  imposition  of  civil  penalties  for  violations,  through  a  committed  staff  of 
300  air  cargo  security  inspectors  and  additional  aviation  security  inspectors.  Thus 
far, this program has successfully managed risk, while allowing the airline industry 
to provide air cargo service on passenger flights. We plan to maintain this approach 
of vigorous enforcement, coupled with continued technological research and develop-
ment.  However,  any  mandate  to  physically  inspect  100  percent  of  air  cargo  within 
3 years is not feasible without impeding the legitimate flow of commerce and impos-
ing an unreasonable cost on the government. 
Conclusion 

2006 was a growth and performance year for TSA. We have come a long way since 
this committee wrote ATSA and since the 9/11 Commission issued its recommenda-
tions. We now have a strong, flexible, effective operating capability at TSA with the 
proven ability to network with others in government and industry around the world. 
While  we  still  have  holes  that  need  to  be  filled  and  foundations  that  need  to  be 
strengthened,  we  have  a  sound  strategy,  effective  against  an  adaptive  enemy,  and 
the  operating  capability  to  execute  it.  Part  of  this  strategy  will  be  a  continuously 
adaptive  response.  While  we  understand  that  travelers  are  looking  for  continuity 
and  certainty  in  their  travel  experience,  we  need  to  balance  that  need  against  the 
need to remain adaptive to the ever-changing threat. 

This  Committee  created  the  TSA  and  gave  it  a  critical  mission.  The  men  and 
women  of  TSA  have  signed  up  to  do  that  mission  and  are  today  fulfilling  it.  It  is 
demanding work and our job satisfaction comes from participating in the most com-
pelling  mission  of  our  time  and  we  understand  that  while  criticism  comes  with  the 
job, TSA has the honor of doing meaningful work on behalf of our country. 

Further  progress  in  2007  will  be  made  and  our  success  will  be  greater  if  we  can 
finish  the  build-out  of  TSA  and  achieve  what  ATSA  envisioned.  The  Congress  and 
Administration  have  provided  the  authorities  and  the  resources  we  need  for  2007 
and  we  will  soon  have  recommendations  for  2008.  I  look  forward,  and  I  know  I 
speak for every one of us at TSA, to working with the Committee and others in Con-
gress  on  achieving  the  vision  that  was  contemplated  during  the  intense  aftermath 
of 9/11, and we will do so with the same intensity we all felt 5 years ago. 

Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today.  I  am  happy 

to respond to the Committee’s questions.

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Mr. Hawley. 
And I would now call upon the Chairman of the Full Committee. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  And  I  have  just  one  technical  question.  In  your 
statement,  you  said  that  it  would  be  very  difficult,  if  not  impos-
sible,  to  physically  inspect  100  percent  of  air  cargo  within  3  years 
without  imposing  an  unreasonable  cost  on  the  government.  How 
would this affect just passengers? Why do you just have passengers 
checked? 

Mr. HAWLEY. What if we—I didn’t——
The CHAIRMAN. Hundred percent. 
Mr. HAWLEY. Of baggage—of freight on passenger aircraft? 
The CHAIRMAN. Would that be feasible? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Well, it would—if it were required by law, we’d fig-
ure out a way to do it in the time-frame that it—it’s required. The 
concern  that  I  have  is  that  100-percent  requirement  in  a  statute 
will  focus  the  effort  on  getting  the  100  percent  done,  which  makes 
it  more  of  a  logistics  issue  than  a  security  issue.  And  it  just  says, 
‘‘Hey,  we’ve  got  to  get  100  percent  of  these  packages  screened  in 
the  way  that  is  required,’’  and  it  would  divert  resources  that  we 
may  prefer  to  be  able  to  move  around  on  an  unpredictable  basis. 
So, I think the concern is that, for a very small incremental benefit 
of  security,  it  would  take  away  resources  that  we  could  more  pro-
ductively apply elsewhere. 

The CHAIRMAN. What is the present percentage of inspection? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11

Mr.  HAWLEY.  It’s  a  classified  number,  and  we  can  talk  about  it 
in  that  environment,  but  it  was  recently  tripled.  But  more  impor-
tantly than that, we’ve been adding security measures to air cargo 
over  the  last  year.  It’s  something  that  Secretary  Chertoff  has  a 
very strong interest in, and he had us really focus on that. 

So  we,  in  the  last  6  months,  have  eliminated  all  exemptions  to 
air  freight.  So,  it  used  to  be  that  there  was  a  certain  percentage 
of freight that was not exempt, and that was the classified number. 
But  what  we’ve  done  now  is,  we’ve  eliminated  all  exemptions,  so 
that right now, no freight is exempt from screening and we require 
a  random  continuous  screening  of  everything,  in  addition  to  the 
former requirement that we had. 

The CHAIRMAN. The rest of the questions I have relate to the ex-
plosive  detection  system,  and  I’d  like  to  submit  them,  Mr.  Chair-
man. OK? 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Absolutely. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  The  former  Chairman  of  the  Full  Com-

mittee, Senator Stevens. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Mr.  Hawley,  I  congratulate  you  on  what  you’ve  done  so  far.  I 
know  that  the  9/11  Commission  has  issued  a  report  card  dealing 
with  the  standards  that  they  seek  to  have  established.  I  do  think 
that  we’ve  invested  a  substantial  amount  of  money  over  the  last  5 
years and made considerable progress. 

I would ask a little clarification of your answer to the Chairman’s 
question.  Now,  you’re  talking  about  baggage  originating  in  the 
United  States,  going  to  another  place  in  the  United  States,  I  as-
sume.  Is  there  a  difference  between  that  and  baggage  that’s  going 
out of the country? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No.  Anything  that’s  loaded  onto  a  passenger  craft 

is subject to this requirement. 

Senator STEVENS. And why would it be more difficult to establish 
the  same  criteria  for  the  cargo  that’s  getting  onto  a  passenger 
plane? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  There  are  a  lot  of—the  operational  impact  is  sig-
nificant,  because  a  lot  of  that  freight  is  palletized,  put  into  very, 
very  large  packages  that  do  not  fit  in  the  existing  EDS  machines, 
and we have a——

Senator  STEVENS.  We  call  those  ‘‘combo  flights’’  up  our  way,  in 
Alaska.  I  thought  they  were  basically  barred  in  many  of  the  air-
craft today. 

Mr. HAWLEY. We have a special program for—that includes Alas-
ka—that’s different because of the different nature of Alaska, obvi-
ously. But we have a science and technology project that’s now op-
erating  in  San  Francisco  that  is  using  the  EDS  machines  and  try-
ing to establish what the operating protocol would be if we wanted 
to  run  everything  through  the  EDS  machines.  So,  it’s  something 
that  we  are  looking  at.  It  would  take  a  tremendous  amount  of  re-
sources to get this done. 

Senator STEVENS. Is there palletized freight on our major airlines 

in what we call the Southern 48? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  STEVENS.  And  where  is  it?  Is  it  like  it  is  in  Alaska—in 

12

front of the passengers? 

Mr. HAWLEY. It’s underneath, typically. 
Senator STEVENS. Yes. Underneath. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  And  what  they  do  under  our  new  system  is—that 
we’re  trying  some  innovative  things,  with  canine  teams,  of  some 
programs that are in Europe, where they essentially get inside the 
shrinkwrap  of  these  palleted  items,  and  then  have  the  dogs  come 
by and take, you know, do their reading of the fumes based in that 
pallet. 

So, we’re looking at a lot of innovative things. And I should say, 
we  don’t  disagree  that  screening  air  cargo  on  passenger  planes  is 
very important; it’s really a question of, Operationally, what is the 
best security value for the investment of time? 

Senator  STEVENS.  Have  airlines  in  any  way  objected  to  applica-

tion of screening to that type of cargo? 

Mr. HAWLEY. I don’t get real pushback from airlines, on the con-
cept that we need to do it, and I’ve heard a lot of suggestions about 
increasing  the  number  of  canine  teams,  because  canines  are  effec-
tive and very flexible. And it clearly is a shared responsibility. We 
all  have  the  same  interest  at  heart.  So  the  question  always  boils 
down to, OK, how are you operationally going to do it? Where’s the 
money going to come from, and what are you doing today that you 
are not going to do once you divert the resources? 

So, we’re all on the same page in terms of needing to do intense 
security on cargo and on passenger aircraft; the debate is, how ex-
actly do you we get it done? 

Senator  STEVENS.  As  you  know,  a  substantial  portion  of  cargo 
that comes into the United States across the Pacific comes through 
our airport in Anchorage. I think it’s the number-one cargo landing 
port now on a daily basis. That sometimes is then broken down and 
put  onto  other  planes  leaving  Anchorage  and  to  go  throughout  the 
U.S. 

There is no screening of that as it comes into the United States. 

Why shouldn’t it be screened there? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  there  is  the—all  freight  cargo  that  comes  in 
on, with no passengers, so that is not subject to screening. But any-
time  that  freight  gets  onto  a  passenger  aircraft  in  the  United 
States, it’s subject to our air cargo requirements. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  understand  what  you’re  saying  about  the 
availability  of  trained  dogs  to  perform  this  mission.  Have  you 
thought of trying to contract that out to the private sector? I think 
they have a way of responding quicker to demands like this. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, the requirement now is principally on the air-
lines, who then contract out with people to do a lot of the work that 
they  do  now.  So  what  we  would  do  is  establish  a  performance 
standard,  and  then  we  would  debate  over  who  would  do  it.  And 
whether the airlines contract for, whether the government pays for 
it—those type of things. It could work well either way. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Why  haven’t  you  increased  the  standard  for 

baggage? I mean, for cargo that’s on passenger planes? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, we have very significantly increased it. We’ve 
had a number of different measures over the last 6 months, includ-
ing the formal rule that we put out which gets at securing the sup-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13

ply  chain  itself;  and  then,  we’ve  added  additional  measures,  like: 
anytime somebody shows up at an airport and wants to put a pack-
age  on  a  specific  flight,  it  has  to  be  screened  the  same  way  as 
checked luggage. 

So,  we  keep  going  after  additional  security  measures  to  put  on 
top  of  each  other.  And  I  think  the  goal  of  100-percent  screening  is 
something that is necessarily out in the future. Our concern is that, 
while  that  debate  is  going  on,  we’re  doing  things  right  now  that 
will  affect,  and  meaningfully  improve,  security  in  the  immediate 
term. 

Senator STEVENS. Well, shifting over to other things, although it 
has  some  impact  on  this  also,  this  committee  has  oversight  on  the 
airline  industry,  per  se,  and  we  know  that  almost  every  one  of 
those airlines has been in and out of bankruptcy during this 5-year 
period that your agency’s been in existence. But it seems like every 
time we require an addition to the security system, it is pushed off 
on  the  airlines  to  pay  for  it.  That  can’t  continue,  really,  in  terms 
of  issues  like  this.  Isn’t  there  some  way  we  can  devise  to  screen 
these, this cargo that goes onto passenger aircraft, without increas-
ing the cost to the airlines, per se? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  and  you  could  say,  ‘‘Well,  the  Government 

pays for it,’’ but one of the things that we’re doing now——

Senator STEVENS. The Government doesn’t pay for it, the airline 
traveler is the only person in the United States that pays for secu-
rity. The rest of it is paid out of taxes. And I think that every time 
we  add  a  burden  to  the  system,  we  further  compress  the  ability  of 
the American airlines to survive. 
What are they doing in Europe? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Well, it’s principally, it’s virtually all on the private 

sector, including the airlines. So——

Senator STEVENS. Do they have higher standards of examination 

of cargo like this? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  They  have,  not  identical,  but  pretty  close—there’s 
a pretty close match in, particularly passenger screening, and we’re 
working with them to align the air cargo. But really the burden is 
principally on airlines overseas. 

And one of the things I was going to mention is that we—one of 
the  things  we’ve  done  for  air  cargo  is  we’ve  got  360  canine  teams, 
and we’ve devoted a quarter of their time in the air cargo environ-
ment,  so  that—of  our  security  resources—we’re  devoting  a  greater 
proportion  to  get  after  the  air  cargo.  And  that’s  at  no  additional 
cost, either to us or the airlines. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Now,  I’m  going  to  get  shot  when  I  get  home 
tonight.  My  colleagues  know  this.  Repeatedly,  we  have  been 
stopped  because  my  wife’s  name  is  Catherine  Stevens.  And  it 
comes out, in terms of the No Fly List, as ‘‘Cat Stevens.’’ As a mat-
ter of fact, one time I personally was taken to the security advisor 
because  I  was  checking  in  the  baggage  in  her  name—mine  and 
hers—and they took me, too. 

Now,  what  has  been  done  to  really  try  and  find  a  way  to  deal 
with  this?  I  believe  that  we  should  have  those  lists,  but,  for  in-
stance,  it  would  seem  to  me  that  anyone  that  was  making  such  a 
list  would  put  down  ‘‘Cat  Stevens,  male.’’  That  doesn’t  take  that 
much  change  in  these  lists.  Has  anyone  looked  at  trying  to  make 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14

them  more,  really,  a  means  of  identifying  a  person  that  is  a  great 
risk to the passengers? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. And that is something that, once Secure Flight 
is  up,  next  year,  will  be  a  thing  of  the  past.  But  right  now  what 
happens  is,  when  we  get  a  name—for  instance,  if  a  Cat  Stevens 
and a Catherine Stevens—the Catherine Stevens would tell us, and 
then we’d put a notation in the record that we send to the airlines 
that  says,  ‘‘This  is  Catherine  Stevens,  she’s  not  Cat  Stevens  and 
don’t hassle her.’’

Unfortunately it depends, airline by airline, how their individual 
systems work, as to how effectively that’s done. And it definitely—
we  recognize  the  inconvenience,  we—it  hits  people  at  kiosks  and 
printing  boarding  passes  at  home.  But  that  is  the  one  piece  of  the 
puzzle—that’s  the  cost  to  the  watch-list  system  we  have  now.  But, 
the upside of it is, we have a very good reliability in terms of stop-
ping  people  who  are  the  person  you  want  to  keep  off  the  airplane. 
We do an excellent job of that. 

Senator  STEVENS.  I  have  a  feeling  that  someone  who  knew  their 
name was on it would find a way to use a false name. It’s the peo-
ple who use their own name that are the ones most affected by the 
purge list today. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  the  system  is  smarter  than  that,  actually, 
and there are a variety of things where that is taken into account. 
And I’ll just leave it at that in the public session. 

Senator  STEVENS.  All  right.  One  last  comment.  Your  testimony 
indicates that you dealt with the passenger redress concept, reduc-
ing the delay from 60 days to 10 days. And in the absence of these 
new  concepts,  such  as  Secure  Flight  and  Registered  Traveler,  is 
there any other solution to dealing with the people who have been 
denied boarding passes? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  working  with  the  airlines  to  help  with  their 
matching process is something we are doing; and that—that’s prob-
ably  the  next-best  thing  that  will  happen  prior  to  introducing  Se-
cure Flight. It’s having the sophistication of the matching software 
that  would  identify—as  you  point  out—this  is  a  male,  or  this  is  a 
female,  or  other  characteristics.  So,  until  we  get  Secure  Flight  up, 
it really is a function of how well we can get the matching to work 
consistently across airlines. 

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  I’ve  asked  that  my  statement  appear 

in the record. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. It will be done. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Chairman  Inouye,  thank  you  for  scheduling  this  hearing  today.  Being  our  first 
hearing in the new Congress, I would like to welcome the new members to the Com-
mittee. Welcome. 

Mr.  Hawley,  thank  you  for  your  willingness  to  appear  before  the  Committee  and 
for your tireless work to secure our Nation’s transportation systems. While you have 
made tremendous strides, TSA must continue to press forward by focusing on a risk-
based layered aviation security system, and developing and maintaining a workforce 
that  is  flexible  and  proactive.  The  American  taxpayers  have  invested  substantially 
in security over these past 5 years, and some may question the rate at which signifi-
cant measures, such as passenger pre-screening programs, have been implemented. 
We must work together to develop the appropriate solutions to these issues. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15

The  9/11  Commission  was  tasked,  in  part,  with  setting  a  benchmark  for  aviation 
security, but the real-world applications and solutions to many of the Commission’s 
goals remain a significant challenge. In December 2005, the 9/11 Commission issued 
a report card on the implementation of its recommendations and gave TSA very low 
grades in transportation security categories. Although we have come to realize over 
the  years  that  in  matters  of  security,  there  is  no  ‘‘one  simple  solution,’’  this  does 
not mean that more progress in certain critical areas should not be made. 

I  have  maintained  that  true  improvements  in  our  aviation  security  system  rest 
on  the  promise  of  technology  development  and  deployment.  Today,  U.S.  airports 
screen  an  annual  535  million  parcels  of  checked  baggage  for  explosives.  That  num-
ber  will  certainly  increase  in  the  coming  years.  The  projected  growth  and  changes 
in our aviation system also call for a new and focused direction for both safety and 
security. We need to be proactive and find ways to finance the deployment of proven 
and effective technologies, in an innovative fashion. Similarly, we need to encourage 
the private sector to develop inventive, integrated and interoperable solutions. 

We must find these solutions while being mindful of the required delicate balance 
between  implementing  tough  security  measures  and  the  effect  of  these  regulations 
on  the  Nation’s  economy.  One  such  issue  which  has  proven  challenging  to  all  enti-
ties  involves  the  screening  of  100  percent  of  air  cargo.  The  U.S.  air  cargo  supply 
chain  handles  more  than  50,000  tons  of  cargo  each  day,  of  which  13,000  tons,  or 
26 percent, is designated for domestic passenger carriers. We are tasked with deliv-
ering  a  common  sense  solution  that  meets  the  goal  of  balancing  enhanced  security 
without  excessively  impeding  the  normal  flow  of  commerce.  Shutting  down  the 
movement  of  goods  is  not  acceptable—but  creating  unrealistic  and  unattainable 
deadlines is not the answer. 

Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  address  these 

challenges in the new Congress.

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  want  to,  at  this  time—not  for  the  pur-
poses of questioning, but for the purposes of courtesy—to recognize 
Senator  Klobuchar,  Amy  Klobuchar  from  Minnesota.  This  is  your 
first  meeting  with  this  committee,  and  I  think  you’ll  find  this  the 
most exciting Committee that you’re on. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Senator,  I  look  forward  to  serving  on  the 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. We look forward to having you here, very, 

Committee. Thank you. 

very much. 

Mr.  Hawley,  we  had  a  chance  to  talk,  at  some  length  the  other 
day,  in  a  secure  situation,  so  use  your  discretion  as  you  answer 
these  questions.  There  was  a  question  of  the  cargo  supply  chain, 
and—if  that’s  international,  then  it’s  where  it’s  loaded,  perhaps  it 
was loaded on a truck to then be loaded on an airplane in a foreign 
port,  foreign  airways,  and  then  there’s  a  question  of  off-loading. 
Now,  once  you’ve  off-loaded,  I  would  think  that  that  responsibility 
comes  to  an  end  and  there  should  have  been  a  really  good  check 
in the system. 

The problem is that TSA’s computer models estimate that, if you 
do  full  physical  screening  just  at  the  end  of  destination  in  an  air-
port  in  our  country,  that  you  can  only  really  do  4  percent  of  the 
daily  volume.  And  the  reason  for  that,  evidently,  is  because  of 
equipment  breakdowns,  inspection  problems,  reassembling  what 
you  take  apart  to  look  at  for  transport,  and  all  the  rest  of  it.  But 
4 percent is not very encouraging. 

Now, we discussed that in a number of ways, but I’d like to have 

you answer that. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Sure.  The  detail  on  the  operations  is  what  really 
will  determine  whether  it’s  effective  or  not,  because  if  you  say  it’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16

100  percent  of  electronic  screening  or  box  opened  or  whatever  the 
definition  is,  there’s  a  difference  of—if  you  go  through  and  just 
open  the  lid  in  every  box,  that’s  an  open-box  inspection—which  is 
different  from  if  you  pull  out  the  stereo  speakers  and  look  inside 
the,  you  know,  the  battery  compartment  or  you  take  it  apart.  So, 
you  could  say,  ‘‘Well,  we’re  going  to  run  every  one  of  these  pack-
ages  through  an  x-ray  machine,’’  which  may  or  may  not  get  at  the 
threat you’re looking at. So, that’s why we prefer not to have a 100-
percent  requirement  on  anything,  because  you  tend  to  be  focused, 
then,  on,  ‘‘How  do  we  accomplish  what  is  written  in  the  law?’’  as 
opposed to a smarter security that says, ‘‘OK, we’re in a risk-based 
business. How are we going to stop the bomb from being here?’’

So  anything  that  switches  off  the  brain  is,  I  think,  a  bad  thing, 
and  to  replace  it  with  a  risk-based  scenario,  where  we  actually 
have engagement on how we screen and it, I think, it is a better—
So,  I  think  4  percent  is  too  low,  period,  by  an  order  of  magnitude. 
And  we  definitely  are  on  the  program.  This  is  a  serious  priority  of 
ours, and we are elevating security. 

So, we’re very comfortable working with the Congress on achiev-
ing  the  objective.  The  part  that  really  gets  me  concerned  is  when 
we embed in the law 100 percent, because then that restricts, real-
ly, what you do. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  understand  that.  At  the  same  time, 
when  you  say  this  is  sort  of  a  risk-based  assessment,  that  can  be 
pretty  hard  to  do.  I  mean,  people  can  now  break  things  apart  so 
that  each  of  the  individual  parts  mean  nothing,  but  when  they’re 
assembled they become a dangerous weapon. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes.  Well,  it  depends  what  you’re  looking  for.  If 
you’re  looking  for  a  bomb  that’s  going  to  blow  up  the  plane,  that’s 
an easier thing. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Well,  they  couldn’t  possibly  blow  up  a 
plane  because  it’s  in  many  pieces,  but  it  may  be  shipped  with  the 
idea of doing damage once it’s landed. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Exactly, so that would—if you’re going to—that’s a 
very  hard  assignment  to  figure  out,  operationally.  So,  that  would 
be an enormous cost. And right now, our focus is principally on ex-
plosives.  The  TSA  function  is  to  make  sure  there’s  not  a  bomb  on 
the  plane  that’s  going  to  take  down  a  passenger  aircraft.  So,  it’s 
the—Customs  and  Border  Protection  handles  the  ‘‘what’s  in  the 
box’’ and whether it’s legal or illegal, and that is a different regime, 
not covered by what we’re talking about here. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  If  one’s  dealing  with  risk,  one  is  making 
a  judgment  of  what  part  of  a  piece  of  baggage  or  cargo,  et  cetera, 
might  be  more  dangerous  than  another  part,  or  what  is  it  that  we 
have  to  focus  on.  Now,  that  can  be  done  from  two  points  of  view. 
One  would  be  that  we  know  how  to  get  the  really  dangerous  stuff, 
and so, don’t go at the rest of it; or one could argue that Homeland 
Security  is,  in  my  judgment,  vastly  underfunded,  and,  therefore, 
you’re  forced  to  make  a  risk  assessment,  because  you  can’t  do  all 
of  what,  in  fact,  you  would  like  to  be  able  to  do.  And  I  wonder  if 
you could just help me, a little bit, to understand that. 

Mr. HAWLEY. I think, as a security matter, even if we had unlim-
ited resources I would probably not suggest the 100-percent stand-
ard.  And  I  think  a  way  to  look  at  it  is—I  mentioned,  on  packages 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17

that are targeted for specific flights—on packages that are targeted 
for specific flights, they’re screened the same way as a checked bag. 
So,  that  is  a  higher-risk  package  because  somebody  says,  ‘‘I  want 
this  package  on  that  flight.’’  And  if  we  have  a  controlled  supply 
chain  that  we  know  the  people  shipping  it  and  know  the  people 
carrying  it,  and  it  could  go  on  any  flight,  and  perhaps  even  be 
trucked—that,  then  you’d  say  there’s  a  lower  risk  to  that,  because 
the  person  packing  the  box  did  not  know  whether,  in  fact,  it  was 
going  to  go  on  a  truck  or  an  aircraft.  So,  that  that  kind  of  trade-
off, you can make. And I think, as we discussed, and as you raised 
with  me,  there  is  the  concern  of  other  people  at  the  airport,  in 
terms  of  insider  threat,  so  that  if  you  spend  all  your  resources 
opening boxes and not applying your resources more generally, that 
opens up another vulnerability. 

So,  I  think  that  it  applies  not  only  in  what  boxes  you  open,  but 
where  you  put  your  security  resources,  so  there’s  no  other  area 
that’s wide open, because the adaptive terrorist will go there. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. All right, well, my time is out and, for the 
moment,  in  the  second  round  I’m  going  to  talk  a  bit  about  general 
aviation. 

Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
I  just  have  a  few  questions  about  the  TSA.  One  of  my  impres-
sions  of  the  TSA  is  that  TSA  seems  to  react  to  the  latest  security 
breach  or  the  latest  thing  that’s  in  the  media.  What  can  the  TSA 
and the aviation industry do to anticipate what’s coming down the 
road, instead of always be reacting to the situation? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes. Well, we of course want to do both, and, when 
we  do  react,  people  notice  it.  But  that  doesn’t  mean  that  we  don’t 
try  to  get  ahead  of  it.  And  I  think  the  liquids  plot  this  summer  is 
a  good  example.  And  I  think  it’s  not  widely  known  that,  when  we 
were  talking  about  the  IED  component  training  a  year  ago,  that 
there  was  a  liquids  component  to  that  training.  And,  in  fact,  we 
were  doing  covert  testing  on  liquid  explosives  prior  to  knowing 
about this plot. 

So,  we  have—and  as  we  were  just  talking  with  Senator  Rocke-
feller—as  we  have  security  measures  that  we  can  move  around  in 
unpredictable  fashion,  it  covers  both  what  we  know,  but  also  can 
disrupt what we don’t know. 

So,  the  connection  with  the  intel  community  is  critical  for  us, 
that really starts our day, the connection with the intel community, 
and then operationalizing it at TSA to try to get ahead. 

Senator PRYOR. About 11 months ago, Cathleen Barrick from the 
GAO  came  here  to  talk  to  the  Commerce  Committee  about  imple-
menting the Secure Flight program and some of the challenges that 
remain there, and then, I guess, last month TSA issued the Secure 
Flight Report. And one of the concerns that the GAO had was pri-
vacy. And my question for you is, do you think that the Privacy Of-
fice report addresses the GAO concerns sufficiently? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  the  report  that  just  came  out  referred  to  an 
incident  that  was  prior  to  the  GAO  reports.  The  GAO  report—and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18

this recent one—were on the same topic. And when I mentioned in 
my  opening  statement  when  I  was  here  last  year  and  called,  basi-
cally, a halt to Secure Flight until re-baselined to protect privacy—
we were all talking about the same thing. And we are on the same 
page  now,  going  forward,  with  what  the  privacy  requirements  are. 
And  we  have  now  completed  that  re-baselining  so  we’re  prepared 
to  move  forward.  And  GAO  will  be  evaluating  us  going  forward, 
and we have a lot of engagement with them right now. 

Senator PRYOR. What is your time-frame on moving forward and 

having some sort of final set of rules out there? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  we  expect  to  begin  implementation  in  cal-

endar 2008. 

Senator PRYOR. Implementation in calendar year 2008, but early 

2008? Late 2008? What, where? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  a  lot  will  depend  on  the  rule.  And  there  has 
been  so  much  public  anxiety  about  this  topic  that  we’re  very  con-
fident  people  will  have  a  lot  of  comment.  And  that  will  dictate  a 
lot of the time right there. 

Senator  PRYOR.  We’ve  talked  a  little  bit  about  the  9/11  Commis-
sion recommendation of screening everything, but part of their rec-
ommendations  deals  with  individuals  who  have  been  selected  for 
secondary  screening.  And  I  guess  the  9/11  Commission  believes 
they  should  all  undergo  explosives  screening.  But  that’s  not  what 
TSA has been doing. You guys have apparently been screening pas-
sengers by an observation technique, is that right? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, that’s on top of the other screening. 
Senator  PRYOR.  OK,  do  you  conduct  explosives  screening  for 

every passenger that’s been pulled out for secondary screening? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. For secondary screening, we do random ex-

plosives checking of every passenger. 

Senator  PRYOR.  And  are  your  TSA  people  out  on  the  front  lines, 

are they trained to do this kind of screening? 

Mr. HAWLEY. The explosives screening, absolutely. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  are  you  happy,  generally,  with  what  you 
see? Are you satisfied with what you see from your TSA screeners? 
Mr. HAWLEY. I am very proud of the work that they’ve done, par-

ticularly in the last year. I’m extremely, very positive on it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  the  reason  I  ask  is  because,  our  office  re-
ceives  complaints  from  time  to  time,  various  screeners  or  various 
airports where things just don’t seem to be working very smoothly, 
but you’re satisfied with the screeners? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  am,  and  I  think  the  night  of  August  9th,  10th—
these guys we woke up in the middle of the night and said, ‘‘Come 
to  work  and  change  the  entire  security  process,  and  forget  about 
vacation or anything else for the foreseeable future.’’

Senator  PRYOR.  Are  you  saying  that  the  system  we  have  cannot 

be improved upon? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Oh, absolutely. I think we have great people, we’ve 
now  started  to  improve  the  training,  we’ve  put  incentives  to  keep 
the  good  people  in.  And  those  kind  of  things,  reducing  injuries,  all 
of those things make for a better workforce. 

Senator PRYOR. And you feel like the workforce is getting better? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. That’s all I have. Thank you, Mr. Hawley. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you. 
Senator Lautenberg? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
And  just  a  couple  of  things  first;  and  one  is  to  say  that,  in  front 
of  this  hearing,  this  first  of  the  year,  that  I  want  to  pay  our  com-
mendation  to  Senator  Stevens  for  a  lot  of  good  work  in  chairing 
this  committee,  and  other  committees.  Not  that  we’re  sorry  to  see 
the  change,  Senator  Stevens,  but  the  fact  is  that  you  did—to  bor-
row an expression—a heck of a good job. 

And,  Mr.  Chairman,  my  congratulations  to  you  as  well,  for  tak-

ing over this very important subcommittee. 

Mr. Hawley, you made a comment in response to Senator Pryor’s 
question that said, ‘‘We have a random check on every passenger,’’ 
I’m not quite sure I——

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Every  passenger  is  subject  to  a  random  check.  So, 

in other words——

Senator LAUTENBERG. Can be, have a——
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, yes. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I see. OK. And I think it’s fair to say that 
there has been a real improvement in the TSA process, the screen-
er process, and we’re pleased to see it. 

I  have  a  question,  however,  about  the  complement  that  is  nec-
essary to do the job. We’re looking at 2 million people a day board-
ing  airplanes,  over  750  million  in  the  air—2015,  I  think,  it’s  ex-
pected there’ll be a billion passengers a year flying. We’re breaking 
all  kinds  of  records  for  air  travel.  And  we  have  a  limit  of  45,000 
screeners, and we don’t have that many people working, how many 
people do we have employed right now? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  A  little  bit  under  43,000—it  depends  on  full-time 

equivalent, so our cap it comes out to 43,000. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. The cap or the dollars? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  The  dollars.  So,  the  cap  says  you  can’t  have  more 
than  45,000,  but  the  money,  if  you  spend  it,  only  gets  you  43,000. 
So, the cap is effectively at 43,000. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Could we use more screeners than that? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  I  think  we  are  not  bumping  up  against  the 
cap  and  limiting  our  operation  because  of  that,  at  this  point.  And 
I  think,  you  raised  the  issue  of—as  traffic  grows—at  some  point 
there  is  a  limit.  But  we’ve  been  having  a  lot  of  efficiency  gains  in 
the  workforce,  better  scheduling  and  better  metrics  that  allow  us 
to  manage  better,  so,  so  far  we’re  able  to  manage  it  by—take  the 
greater  number  of  passengers  with  operating  efficiency.  So,  at  this 
minute,  it’s  not  a  problem.  As  passengers  grow,  it  certainly  is  a 
subject of conversation. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What’s the turnover rate within TSA? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  It’s  about  20  percent  overall,  but  the  critical  part 
is  the  part-time.  So,  we’re  about  16.5  percent  on  the  full-time  and 
about 38 percent on part-time. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Is that a heavy load? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Well, the——
Senator LAUTENBERG.—those, those billets? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No,  actually,  we’re  able  to  fill  the  jobs.  It  costs  us 
$12,000  every  time  we  hire  and  train.  So,  any  turnover—particu-
larly in a part-timer—is a bad deal. And what we want to do is get 
people in who will stay, and last spring, as you may know, we went 
to a local hiring model which has allowed us—that in itself gets us 
a higher retention rate. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. That’s a very, that’s a very high rate as it 
is.  Twenty  percent  or  sixteen  percent  turnover  in  a  workforce, 
that’s not a lot. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well it—pre-9/11 it was 140 percent. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  that  doesn’t,  that’s  not  a  good  mark 
to go to. You’re looking at the possibility of turning over 9,000 peo-
ple,  eight  to  nine  thousand  people  a  year,  that’s  quite  an  assign-
ment. 

I  had  asked  to  have  the  cap  removed  and  we  had  a  vote  on  it 
which  was  overwhelmingly  approved  in  the  Senate,  to  lift  it  up  to 
45,000  to  try  to  accommodate  the  needs  of  the  passengers.  And  I 
think  it’s  generally  thought  that  if  we  could  get  security  review 
time  down  to  10  minutes,  that  would  be  a  good  objective.  Is  that 
achievable? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir.  And  by  and  large,  we  are  achieving  that. 
And I think the Thanksgiving and New Year, all of those high trav-
el times, we did manage to get through without unreasonably long 
lines. 

I’m very mindful of this issue, and my obligation to come forward 
if  I  believe  there  is  a  security  impact.  But  right—as  of  this  mo-
ment—I’m comfortable with the package that we have now. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, the fact of the matter is that I fly al-
most weekly between here and home, and I see lots of times when 
the security lines are far more than 10 minutes in the Newark Air-
port, North Liberty and we’re short, I think, about 100 TSA screen-
ers.  And,  is  that  an  exception,  or  is  that  more  likely  around  the 
country? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, we have to delve into the number, but accord-
ing  to  my  information,  we’re  not  under,  significantly  understaffed 
at Liberty Airport. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What did you say? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  there  may  be  a  reduction  of  the  number  from 
last year. We have the screener allocation model, as you know, and 
that  would  be  at  X.  And  it  may,  in  fact,  be  below  X  in  2007——
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I’d  have  to  look  at  that,  Mr.  Hawley,  be-

cause it’s been a continuing problem. 
Mr. HAWLEY. I’ll look at it as well. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I’m very close to the management at New-
ark  Airport.  So  we,  how  many  people  do  we  have  in  training  at  a 
time? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  don’t  know  off  the  top  of  my  head,  but  it  would 

be to replenish——

more than 43,000 people? 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Right.  So  does  that  say  that  there  are 

Mr. HAWLEY. No. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  If  it’s  less  than  43,000,  then  you  don’t 

have 43,000 screeners, then. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21

Mr.  HAWLEY.  But,  we  look  at  it  checkpoint  by  checkpoint.  And 
it  varies  by  time  of  year,  and  all  sorts  of  things,  so  the  number 
moves all of the time. And we look at it down at the granular level 
for  the  checkpoint  for  the  airport,  as  opposed  to  the  overall  num-
ber. 

The  overall  number,  we  say,  we  just  can’t  go  over  the  cap,  and 

we’re not close to that. 

this. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Mr.  Hawley,  I  suggest  that  you  review 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  And  get  back  to  us  with  that.  Mr.  Chair-
man,  I  ask  unanimous  consent  that  an  opening  statement  that  I 
wanted to submit be included in the record. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Without objection. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Lautenberg follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding today’s hearing on the safety of our skies—
and the 9/11 Commission’s recommendations for improving it. The 9/11 Commission 
gave the Bush Administration a report card on aviation security. 

When  it  came  to  screening  passengers  for  explosives,  the  government  earned  a 

And  when  it  came  to  screening  their  bags  and  cargo,  the  government  earned  a 

‘‘C.’’

‘‘D.’’

Those  grades  show  we  do  not  have  enough  screeners  working  in  our  airports—
and  we  do  not  provide  those  screeners  we  do  have  with  the  training  or  technology 
they need. 

We  need  to  give  the  Transportation  Security  Administration  the  resources  it 
needs  to  protect  the  Nation’s  aviation  system.  Right  now,  the  TSA  has  less  than 
forty-five  thousand  (45,000)  screeners  in  airports  from  Burbank,  California  to  Ban-
gor, Maine. Forty-five thousand is not enough. 

Across our country, more than two million people fly every day; 760 million people 
fly  every  year.  By  2015,  our  aviation  system  is  expected  to  carry  one  billion  pas-
sengers a year. 

Forty-five  thousand  screeners  cannot  get  one  billion  people  through  security  and 

to their gates on-time. 

We need more screeners. And we need them now. 
I offered an amendment to the SAFE Ports Act in September to lift the arbitrary 
cap  on  the  number  of  screeners  that  TSA  can  hire—and  to  get  the  right  number 
of  screeners  into  our  airports,  helping  passengers  make  their  planes.  The  Senate 
passed  my  amendment  by  a  vote  of  85–12.  But  House  Republicans  gutted  it  from 
the  final  SAFE  Ports  bill—and  replaced  it  with  a  provision  on  Internet  gambling. 

We should not be gambling with aviation security. 
America’s  travelers  want  this  cap  on  screeners  lifted.  I  plan  to  offer  legislation 

again to do that. 

In 1990, I served on the Pan Am Flight 103 Commission—and we looked into the 
disaster  that  killed  two-hundred-and-seventy  people  over  Lockerbie,  Scotland.  Back 
then,  our  commission  found  that  we  needed  better  screening  for  explosives.  Seven-
teen years later, I am still saying that same thing. 

It’s  time  to  stop  saying  we  will  get  it  done  later.  It’s  time  to  start  acting  on  it 
now. It’s time to let TSA hire as many screeners as it needs to keep our skies safe.

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Senator Klobuchar? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Secretary  Hawley,  as  a  former  prosecutor  running  an  office  of 
about 400 people, I have some sense of the challenges you have, in 
terms of employees and in terms of the setting of priorities and the 
need to triage things. And we certainly have that every day in our 
office. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22

And  I  also  see  the  changing  world  and  how  you  have  to  adapt 
technologies.  And  we  went  from  crooks  using  crowbars  to  having 
them  use  computers.  And  I’ve  always  said,  we’re  as  sophisticated 
in getting the crooks as the technology that we have. And we have 
to be as sophisticated as they are. 

So,  along  those  lines,  my  question  is  about  the  TSA-run  pas-
senger  pre-screening  and  how  quickly  do  you  think  we’re  going  to 
be  able  to  get  an  effective  pre-screening  system  as  the  9/11  Com-
mission recommended? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  The  key  question  of  matching  terror  watch  lists 
against passenger lists, that’s happening today, run by the airlines. 
So, in terms of a security impact, anybody who’s known to the Gov-
ernment as somebody who should not be flying is, in fact, today not 
allowed  to  fly.  Having  said  that,  we  want  to  replace  the  current 
system  with  what  we  call  Secure  Flight,  which  is  a  Government-
run  program,  which  doesn’t  involve  us  sharing  watch  lists.  So,  it’s 
a better system. 

And,  we  had  a  huge  privacy  issue,  as  you  know,  over  time.  And 
last year we went back and just re-did the whole program to make 
sure  it  was  solid  on  the  privacy  thing.  That’s  done  now,  and  now 
we’re  moving  forward.  So  in  2008,  we  expect  to  be  able  to  deploy 
Secure Flight finally, and take it all in-house. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  the  time-line  is  to  get  it  done  by  2008? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  My  second  question  is  along  the  line 
of  Senator  Stevens’  ‘‘Cat  Stevens’’  question—and  that’s  based  on 
my  own  personal  experience.  I  had  two  hip  replacements  this  year 
because  of  something  I  was  born  with,  in  the  middle  of  the  cam-
paign, I might add, and so I am personally familiar with all of your 
screeners on a very intimate basis. 

Every time I go through the checkpoints, and I can say that they 
do a very good job, and I am in no way thinking that people should 
get  special  treatment,  I  think  that  it’s  impossible  just  to  have 
someone give a card. But I hang out at these screening points with 
people that are much older than myself who have had joint replace-
ments.  And  I  was  just  wondering  if  there’s  any  technology  being 
developed  to  be  able  to  help  people  with  these  hip  and  knee  re-
placements  go  through  security.  I’d  say  about  10  minutes  is  spent 
on  each  one  of  them  after  they  go  through  security.  And  again,  I 
don’t  come  from  any  complaints,  I  think  it’s  the  right  thing  to  do. 
But  as  we  move  forward  and  try  to  triage  our  resources,  and  as 
more  and  more  people  are  getting  knee  and  hip  replacements,  if 
there’s some thought to technology in this area? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  there  is  technology,  and  it  comes  with  a 
cost—the famous backscatter technology is one that would be well-
suited  for  this.  There’s  also  millimeter  wave.  Backscatter  tech-
nology  is  famous  because  there  are  those  who  believe  it  shows  too 
vivid  an  image  of  the  person.  So,  there’s  that  kind  of  a  trade-off. 
But the short answer is: Yes, there is technology that does address 
that. It does come with other issues as well. 

Although  I  have  to  say,  I  think  the  behavior  observation—a  lot 
of  the  person-related  screening,  as  opposed  to  ‘‘are  you  carrying 
something’’  screening—is  really  where  we’ve  got  to  go.  Because  we 
can’t  just  keep  taking  away  things  from  people  based  on—that  we 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23

think they could use it as a weapon. So, we have to keep the clear 
weapons out of the way, no explosives, but get an opinion about the 
person and that, I think, is where we have to go. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Mr. Secretary. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator Stevens? 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
I  was  just  sitting  here  wondering  if  you  could  give  us  an  update 
on  the  concepts  of  the  frequent  traveler,  or  the  special  access  that 
we’ve been thinking about over the years. Is it going to be possible? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir.  It’s—it  is  now,  essentially,  in  operation. 
And one of the providers is rolling it out in airports this week. So, 
when  I  was  last  here  we  said  it  was  going  to  be  a  private  sector 
program.  And  that  has  happened,  we’ve  done  our  security  piece. 
And  one  of  the  unsaid  things  about  this  is  that  the  private  sector 
developed  a  credentialing  program  that  involves  biometrics,  with-
out  a  penny  of  cost  to  the  Government,  that  is  now  up  and  oper-
ating for the RT program, but conceptually could be used for other 
programs as well. 

So,  I  think  everybody  wants  to  know  about  shoes,  coats  and 
laptops,  but  there  are  other  benefits  to  Registered  Traveler  that 
have already come to the fore. So, it’s operating now. 

Senator  STEVENS.  You  say  you’re  going  to  be  able  to  get  a  pro-
gram  that  will  take  care  of  the  problem  of  laptops?  I  don’t  under-
stand. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No.  The  frequent  traveler  would  prefer  to  keep 
shoes  on,  keep  the  laptop  in  their  briefcase,  and  keep  the  coat  on. 
And  we’re  not  yet  at  the  point  where  we  can  accommodate  those 
requests,  so  that  tends  to  be  where  the  discussion  is:  ‘‘Why  do  I 
have to still take off my shoes?’’ And we’re now testing a shoe scan-
ner that is at one of the facilities that’s rolling out Registered Trav-
eler to see whether that helps with the shoes. And we’ll keep mov-
ing  as  we  can  get  technology  to  make  it  easier  and  easier.  But  we 
have already done the biometric certification and we’ve got the pro-
gram  now  running,  and  it’s  up  to  airports  as  they  decide  to  roll  it 
out, to come forward. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Will  those  people  still  be  subject  to  random 

search? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. 
Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Senator  Thune,  from  South  Dakota,  we 
welcome  you  to  this  committee,  I  think  you’ll  enjoy  it  a  great  deal 
and will add a great deal to it. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN THUNE,
U.S. SENATOR FROM SOUTH DAKOTA 

Senator  THUNE.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  appreciate  being 
added to the Committee. I’m kind of the newbie here, and I’m anx-
ious  to  take  on  many  of  the  issues  that  this  committee  deals  with, 
many  of  which  directly  affect  my  state.  So  I’m  grateful  for  the  op-
portunity  to  serve  on  the  Committee.  I  look  forward  to  working 
with  you,  the  Chairman,  and  the  other  members  of—the  Ranking 
Republican  on  the  Committee—on  the  issues  of  importance  to  our 
country and to our respective states. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24

And  I  appreciate  the  hearing  this  morning.  And  I  guess  what  I 
would  simply  say  with  respect  to  this  morning’s  hearing,  Mr. 
Chairman,  is  that  one  of  the  things  that  I  hear  quite  often—I  also 
serve  on  the  Armed  Services  Committee—is  that  you  cannot  suc-
cumb to the tendency to prepare for and fight the last war. 

And Mr. Hawley, I appreciate you being here today and respond-
ing  to  questions,  and  I  think  that’s  something  we  always  have  to 
keep in mind, too, is how do we anticipate what the next threat is 
to our security, to passenger safety on our airlines. 

And I would like to direct a couple of questions, if I might, to you 
with  regard  to  some  of  the  changes  that  have  been  put  in  place, 
and  how  they  bear  on  smaller  airports.  In  my  state  of  South  Da-
kota, we are a state with smaller population centers, and air serv-
ice into and out of our state is somewhat limited—relative to what 
I  would  like  to  see  it  be.  I’d  like  to  see  a  few  more  direct  flights 
from  Sioux  Falls  to  Washington,  D.C.—I  don’t  think  I’m  going  to 
see  that  any  time  soon—but  I  do  think  it’s  important  that  we 
evaluate,  always,  how  these  policies  that  we  put  in  place  are  im-
pacting smaller airports. 

I  guess  I’m  interested  in  knowing  if  there  were  any  differences 
with  regard  to  some  of  the  changes  that  were  put  in  place  last 
summer  regarding  gels  and  liquids,  and  the  response  in  smaller 
airports  in  comparison  to  large  airports.  Did  TSA  see  any  dif-
ference  in  how  capable  our  smaller  airports  were  at  implementing 
the  new  screening  protocols?  Were  smaller  airports  perhaps  more 
nimble and quicker in terms of adapting to these new changes? Or 
were  they  behind  the  curve  in  terms  of  having,  perhaps,  fewer  re-
sources to throw at it? 

Mr. HAWLEY. It’s pretty even across the system and we are test-
ing,  a  part  of—we  do  covert  testing—and  the  bulk  of  our  covert 
testing is at larger airports but we are checking airports of all sizes 
to  be  able  to  answer  that  question.  Overall,  it  is  remarkably  con-
sistent  and  it  needs  to  be,  because  obviously  you  start  at  a  small 
airport, you could end up anywhere. 

One of the changes—one of the things is that we do custom-tailor 
the  security  for  the  airport.  In  the  area  of  document  verification, 
in  200  of  the  smaller  airports,  we  now  have  a  trained  Transpor-
tation  Security  Officer  (TSO)  checking  the  ID  and  validating  the 
credential, versus an outside contractor. 

So,  we’ve  been  able  to  work  with  a  lot  of  the  small  airports  to 
say, ‘‘Why don’t you guys carry the bags, that’s not a security func-
tion,  and  we’ll  take  over  the  identity  verification?’’  And  that  is,  I 
believe, an increase in security. And it’s something that we’ve been 
able  to  work  out—in  the  smaller  communities,  it  has  a  bigger  im-
pact  in  the  larger  airports  because  of  the  cost.  So  if  you  were  to 
say,  what’s  the  biggest  difference  small  to  large?  I  would  say  that 
would  be  it.  But  it’s  not  a  requirement,  it’s  really  a  business  prac-
tice. 

Senator  THUNE.  And  you  had  mentioned  in  your  testimony  that 
the  TSA  is  introducing  some  new  programs  focused  on  developing 
specialized skills in the TSA workforce, including training of behav-
ior detection officers, and bomb appraisal officers. I guess I’d be in-
terested in knowing as well, are there plans in place to ensure that 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25

questions. 

smaller  airports  are  receiving  that  type  of  specialized  training  for 
their TSA staff as well? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, although the direct answer to your question is 
it’s  not  at  the  top—the  first  roll-out  of  the  behavior  detection  will 
be  at  the  larger  airports,  but  the  plan  is  to  train  everybody  in  the 
base  level  of  that  skill,  and  then  add  the  more  advanced  on  top  of 
that. So it’s not excluded, but it’s not, frankly, at the top of the pri-
ority list at this point. 

Senator THUNE. I appreciate that. 
And  Mr.  Chairman,  as  I  said,  I’m  looking  forward  to  the  oppor-
tunity to serving with you all on this committee, and probing some 
of these difficult and challenging issues that we face. 

So, I thank you for your testimony and for your response to those 

I yield back my time. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Thank  you,  Senator,  and  I  resonate  with 
your  Sioux  City-direct-to-Washington  flights—West  Virginia  and 
South  Dakota,  which  are  two  of  the  more  rural  states  in  America, 
as we both know. 

Mr.  Hawley,  a  couple  of  questions:  There  is  a  tendency  on  the 
part of Members of Congress and, obviously members of the public, 
to try and speed up the system, almost at any cost. And I, frankly, 
would just prefer to see you doing what you can possibly do as well 
as you can do it, even if it takes longer. 

Now, let me give you an example. We were discussing a moment 
ago the situation where Catherine becomes Cat, I was on a shuttle 
yesterday from LaGuardia with my Chief of Staff whose first name 
is  Carrie,  and  they  had  down  only  a  Catherine.  One  of  the  TSA 
screeners  said,  ‘‘I’m  sorry,  I  can’t  let  a  Carrie  go  through  when  we 
have  a  Catherine  down.’’  Now,  we  were  literally  minutes  from 
missing  the  shuttle,  which  would  have  caused  me  to  miss  two 
votes, or three or five or whatever it was yesterday afternoon. And 
I  was  thinking,  as  this  was  sorted  through,  that  it  was  exactly 
what should be happening. That your screener, who was just at the 
part  that  you  enter,  she  looks  at  the  names  and  make  sure  that 
the identification is right. It would have been irresponsible had she 
allowed  the  Carrie  H.  to  go  through  without  knowing  that  it  was 
actually Catherine H. And I think those kinds of things make enor-
mous differences. 

The  speed  with  which  we  do  things—getting  into  the  fast  lane, 
all of that—are tremendously important, but this all comes from 9/
11  when  two  large,  fueled  airplanes,  or  three—actually  four—at-
tacked.  I  think  that  airlines  are  still  very  much  the  weapon  of 
choice—airplanes  I  would  say—are  the  weapon  of  choice.  I  think 
it’ll spread, dirty bombs, things of that sort, I think they’re all part 
of our future. 

But,  in  the  meantime  I  think  we  just  have  to  do  it  right.  The 

focus has to be transportation security and airline security. 

Now, we were discussing the 45,000 cap limit, and then that sort 
of  nudges  me  toward  general  aviation.  I  believe  that  about  three-
quarters  of  all  the  flights  in  the  air  at  any  given  moment  in  the 
United  States  are  general  aviation.  The  percentage  of  those  which 
are over a certain weight limit or under a certain weight limit, I’m 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26

not  exactly  sure.  But  that  involves  some  19,000  airports  at  which 
general aviation planes are likely to land, only in our own country. 
In the times that I’ve used general aviation, I think only once in 
my life have I ever gone through a passenger thing. I find this very 
disturbing, and I talked about it very openly with the general avia-
tion  people  who  are  not  anxious  to  see  changes  made,  but  under-
stand that they have to do their part, too. 

You have a program about that, and in our discussions the other 
day,  I  think  you  talked  about  that—you’re  going  to  have  to  have 
a  lot  more  than  45,000  people  if  we  do  general  aviation,  which  is 
excluded  at  this  point.  I  don’t  understand  the  reason  for  that.  I 
have  a  son  who  lives  in  New  York,  and  when  that  single-engine 
plane  went  into  a  building,  it  was  a  building  right  next  to  where 
he was, and it was a single-engine plane. Well, in fact, it turns out 
that most general aviation is single-engine airplanes. 

Now,  you  make  cutoffs,  and  if  this  is  a  secure  matter  and  you 
can’t  talk  about  it,  then  don’t.  But  I  think  the  matter  of  making 
sure  that  general  aviation  goes  through  approximately  the  same 
process—or at least something that measures the standards of pas-
senger  screening,  of  pilot  identification,  what’s  going  onboard—is 
very much a part of our future. And if it is not, then we’re not tak-
ing the lessons of 9/11 seriously. 

Your comments, sir? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  I  think  we  agree  that  we  can  have  no  doors 
completely open. And I know we agree on the topic of—we have to 
be  concerned  about  other  threats  than  blowing  up  a  plane,  other 
kinds  of  weapons.  And  Secretary  Chertoff  has  made  it  an  unmis-
takable priority at DHS for me and my colleagues at other DHS en-
tities.  And  so  we  are  looking  at  what  are  the  steps  we  take  in  the 
short  term  that  would  measurably  improve  security  as  we  figure 
out the longer-term issue? And I think at the end of that spectrum 
is the physical screening of passengers getting on GA airplanes. 

But there are a lot of security measures, there are security meas-
ures in place about security on the ground, but there are a number 
of gradations that we can ratchet up. And frankly, we plan to over 
the  next  year—and  are  in  conversation  now  with  the  GA  commu-
nity about—what we can do operationally now as we develop some 
of the issues going forward. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  But  that  doesn’t  really  answer  my  ques-
tion,  and  I’ve  overrun  my  time.  So,  I’ll  return  to  my  questioning 
after Senator Lott has a chance to ask questions. 

STATEMENT OF HON. TRENT LOTT,
U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  And  I  apologize 
for my tardiness, but we were marking up the small business bene-
fits part of the minimum wage increase and I wanted to participate 
in that. But thank you for having the hearing, I’m looking forward 
to working with you on aviation issues. 

It’s good to see you again, Mr. Hawley, thank you for coming and 
for  the  job  you’ve  been  trying  to  do.  It’s  not  an  easy  task—
everybody’s expecting you to do more, sometimes less, improve effi-
ciencies, make us safe, and it’s a real challenge. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27

I  don’t  want  to  repeat  the  questions  that  have  already  been 
asked.  First,  just  my  continued  admonition,  and  that  is  to  insist 
that your decisions make common sense, and that your workers use 
common sense. Because that’s the biggest problem I run into some-
times  at  airports.  What  goes  on  just  doesn’t  make  common  sense 
in terms of who you check and how they’re checked. 

I  always  kind  of  enjoy  the  fact  that  my  wife  almost  always  gets 
snatched out of line, and just to make her madder, I take on down 
the  hall  waving  at  her  as  I  leave,  and  she  doesn’t  appreciate  that. 
But,  you  know,  from  various  reasons,  for  instance,  when  she’s  try-
ing to go through the line, her ticket may be in the name of Tricia 
Lott,  but  her  name,  her  ID  card  is  Patricia  T.  Lott.  And  somehow 
or  other,  the  person  at  the  counter  doesn’t  get  it—that  it,  you 
know, look at the picture, yes, it’s the same person, common sense 
is still a problem we run into. 

With regard to cargo vulnerabilities, I know you’ve been working 
on  that.  And  one  suggestion  that  the  Commission  made  was  to 
have  at  least  one  blast-proof  cargo  container  on  every  passenger 
plane carrying cargo. I think I understand from the staff, you said 
earlier  that  part  of  the  problem  is  that  cargo  is  on  pallets  quite 
often,  and  you  can’t  get  it  through  a  scanner.  This  makes  common 
sense. Have you looked at that possibility? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. There is a pilot ongoing right now on that, 
and  that  gets  me—we  talked  a  little  bit  earlier  in  the  hearing—
about  risk-base.  And  that  is  one  of  the  ways  we  can  do  it—put  in 
place  something  more  quickly—is  to  say,  for  packages  that  we’re 
more  concerned  about,  we  put  them  in  the  blast-proof  one  and 
that’s a mitigation measure. 

The issue, of course, is how much they weigh, and it’s my under-
standing  there’s  a  new  version  coming  out  that  would  be  signifi-
cantly less in terms of weight, but as good in terms of bomb-proof. 
Senator  LOTT.  Well,  composite  materials  now  are  much  lighter 

and not as heavy and they’re more resistant to blasts. 

Mr. HAWLEY. No, it is definitely something that we’re looking at, 

and there is a place for it in the solution. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  I  think  Congress  is  going  to  be  pushing  on 
this  subject.  We  need  to  try  to  get  ahead  of  the  curve  to  come  up 
with some improvements there. 

Now  another  area,  see,  I  believe  a  lot  of  what  we  need  is  tech-
nology.  We’ve  been  slow  in  moving  the  technology.  I  know  there’s 
a  cost  factor—some  of  the  technology  is  new  and  unproven,  and 
then you always run into, or sometimes at least, a privacy consider-
ation. 

For  instance,  I  understand  you’re  developing  the  whole  body 
backscatter  x-ray  imaging  systems  to  improve  the  detection  of  ex-
plosives  carried  by  passengers,  but  some  people  are  concerned 
about  privacy  requirements.  You’re  trying  to  address  that.  I’ve 
looked  at  that  technology,  and  you  know,  it’s  pretty  amazing  how 
effective  it  is  in  how  you  can  pick  up  even  the  smallest  thing  that 
a  person  might  have  in  their  shoe  or  on  their  person.  And  I  know 
we  get  into  these  privacy  considerations,  but  if  I  run  the  risk  of 
being blown out of the sky, I might make, you know, a little conces-
sion in terms of this. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28

I  realize—look,  when  it  comes  physique,  I’m  embarrassed  by 
what  the  scanner  shows.  I  mean,  I  look  pretty  pitiful.  But  again, 
I  think  your  specifications  don’t  cover  the  field  of  technology.  I 
think this is a technology that we need to move aggressively to. So 
how are we doing on that? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  we’ve  got  two  major  suppliers,  both  of  whom 
are,  you  know,  in  a  horse  race,  so  to  speak.  But  that  gives  some 
competition  to  the  marketplace,  and  we’re  testing  one  of  them  in 
Phoenix—actually  we’re  testing  it  now,  although  not  actually  run-
ning  people  through.  We’re  testing  the  operation  capability,  the 
power  needs  of  it,  how  much  does  it  weigh,  where  do  you  put  the 
resolution. So, we’re actively pushing that now, and that will be in 
operation  in  Phoenix.  So,  we  are  moving  forward  with  it  on  oper-
ational testing. 

Senator  LOTT.  That’s  good,  but  I  think  you  need  to  move  more 
aggressively.  I  mean,  I  was  looking  at  this  technology  back  in  the 
summer. It’s there, it’s available now, we’re using it at our—or that 
type  of  technology—at  our  ports.  I  just,  you  know,  you  need  to 
move more aggressively on some of this stuff. Because your biggest 
cost  is  the  manpower  cost.  We’re  not  going  to  continue  to  give  you 
the  money  you’ve  had.  We’re  going  to  expect  you  to  do  more  with 
less  and  less  people,  and  you’re  going  to  have  to  use  technology  to 
do that. So, aggressively pursue the technology. 

I don’t know what the technology is, but I don’t understand why 
it’s  taking  so  long  to  implement  a  program  I  believe  you  said  you 
were going to do a year or so ago. With regard to—I call them fre-
quent flyers—you pay $100, now I understand you’ve got, it’s work-
ing, a pilot program at two or three places——

Mr.  HAWLEY.  We’re  done.  You  were  unmistakable  last  year  in 
this and TSA has done its part. It’s now up to the airports. So the 
program  is  now  available  to  move  forward  as  the  private  sector 
wishes  to  proceed.  TSA  has  done  all  that  it’s  got  to  do  on  it,  and 
we’re  just—we’re  ready,  and  we’ve  got  one  operating  in  Orlando, 
and there are others that are opening, I believe, this week. 

Senator LOTT. And it’s $100—you have to undergo the check, and 

you have to pay a $100 fee or whatever? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  TSA  says,  ‘‘We’re  going  to  run  a  background 
check and we’re going to charge you $28 to do that.’’ Whatever they 
sell the card for is somebody else’s call. Our part of the cost is $28. 
Senator LOTT. Now, what are you saying here, that it’s really up 

to the individual airport authority? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  No,  it’s  a  private—yes,  it  is  up  to  the  individual 

airport. But it’s a private sector-funded program. 

Senator  LOTT.  I  don’t  understand  why  you  wouldn’t  want  to  do 
this. I mean, that’s one way of thinning out these lines and getting 
a  check  on  people.  Why  are  you  saying,  ‘‘do  it  if  you  want  to’’?  I 
mean, this is something probably we should do. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Well, it gets to the security value of that particular 
background  check.  And,  we’ve  got  60  million  people  a  month  com-
ing through, and it doesn’t quite get us to the level of comfort that 
we could radically change the checkpoint process for the Registered 
Traveler.  When,  hopefully,  we  get  to  that  point,  I  think  it  will  be 
a slam dunk in terms of its cost justification. But for us right now 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29

on  the  security  front,  it  doesn’t  offer  enough  of  a  benefit  to  do  less 
security than we now are asking. 

Senator  LOTT.  Well,  we  continue  to  need  to  do  more  and  to  do 
a  better  job.  It  continues  to  be  an  unbelievable  hassle  at  the  air-
ports. And it’s an area we’re concerned about, because it is a place 
where  we—we’re  standing  in  line.  And  if  people  recognize  Senator 
Rockefeller,  for  example,  they  begin  to  explain  to  him  why  they’re 
mad  about  it.  And  so,  we’re  going  to  be  mad  at  you  until  you  help 
us deal with that constituent complaint. 

And  I  do  understand  that  it’s  been  difficult,  it  takes  time,  it 
takes  money,  but  I  do  think  technology  is  a  key  to  the  solution. 
And we need to move a lot faster in that particular area. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Thank you, Senator Lott. 
Let  me  just  pick  up  on  that,  technology  versus  people.  I’m  not 
sure  that  the  right  answer  always  comes  down  to  technology.  In 
other  words,  as  you  indicated  in  your  testimony,  there’s  nothing 
better  than  the  human  brain.  There’s  nothing  better  than  some-
body being able to look you in the eye and figuring out what you’re 
about,  reading  your  body  language.  And  you  may  have  nothing  on 
you  that’s  detectable,  but  the  person  may  just  figure  you’re  some-
thing  of  a  risk  and  take  you  out  of  line  and  look  at  you  further, 
and  often  nothing  will  come  of  it,  but  I  feel  comfortable  with  that. 
Now,  I  go  through  your  puffer  system  or  whatever  else,  and  I’m 
impressed with that technology. It’s sort of a ‘‘gee whiz’’ type thing, 
and  it  seems  to  work.  On  the  other  hand,  it  breaks  down  quite  a 
lot,  it’s  very  expensive,  you  can’t  get  them  all  over  the  place.  So, 
just  take  the  question  of  people  versus  technology.  One  thing  you 
don’t have a lot of is money, and I remind all as I always do—and 
Senator  Lott  knows  far  better  than  I  do—that  your  testimony  has 
been  screened  by  OMB.  And  therefore,  you  know,  you  sometimes 
can’t  speak  as  freely  as  you  want  to,  and  that’s  just  the  way  the 
system  works.  I  regret  it  under  any  administration,  but  that’s  the 
way that works. 

Can  you  reflect  with  me,  just  a  little  bit,  philosophically  on  peo-
ple  versus  technology?  There’s  a  madness  and  a  love  of  technology 
in this country, and I think it’s the only thing that can get the job 
done  in  some  cases.  And,  I  think,  sometimes  it  can’t  read  things 
that people can. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  think  where  technology  is  an  accelerator,  that’s 
where we need to focus. And one of the issues that we have is that 
a lot of the technology that we buy now is new and that it is when 
it  is  most  expensive  and  least  reliable.  And  when  we  get  further 
down  the  technology  curve,  that’s  where  the  real  payoff  comes. 
And,  I  think,  the  technology  solution  is  indispensable.  I  think  the 
people  part  is  also  indispensable—that  a  lot  of  the  technology  is 
single-purpose,  or  focused  on  a  particular  thing.  And  as  a  number 
of  the  Senators  have  mentioned,  we  want  to  be  able  to  address 
threats  that  weren’t  yesterday’s  threat.  And  the  people—finding 
somebody with hostile intent—is a critical component of that. 

And what we’ve done—nobody else sees 700 million people a year 
up close the way we do. So, to take advantage of the fact that we’re 
interacting,  and  bring  the  behavioral  science—that  science—to  the 
fact that we have people already at the airport, who we are already 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30

paying  to  elevate  the  capability,  and  then  let  them  use  common 
sense. 

And  I  think  one  of  the  biggest  changes  we’ve  made  in  the  last 
year  was  during  the  liquids  thing—everybody  was  focused  on  the 
baggie.  But  we  did  go  to  exactly  the  common  sense  security  that, 
Senator  Lott,  you’ve  mentioned  before,  to  give  discretion  for  com-
mon  sense  to  the  front-line  officer.  And  that  is  a  major  cultural 
change from going to a checklist orientation—where you have to do 
exactly  this  and  you’ll  get  punished  if  you  don’t,  to  ‘‘Here,  you’re 
trained,  this  is  a  threat  that  could  come  in  a  lot  of  different  ways. 
You  make  a  threat  assessment,  based  on  your  common  sense.’’  So, 
I  think  the  human  intuition  is  immediately  available—we  are 
using that in training. So, for the next 2 years, I think that is like-
ly  to  be  the  bulk  of  it.  And  then,  as  the  technology  moves  on  the 
technology  curve—which  is  probably  a  year  and  a  half,  2  years 
out—that will then tilt the balance. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Let  me  get  back  to  the  general  aviation 

situation. 

I  indicated  I  didn’t  think  you’d  answered  my  question.  And  it 
may  be  that  you  can’t  because,  again,  because  of  security,  I  don’t 
know.  But  let  me  just  ask  it  more  simply:  If  three-quarters,  ap-
proximately,  of  airplanes  in  the  sky  at  any  given  moment  during 
the  course  of  the  day  are  general  aviation,  and  so  much  of  our  re-
sources—or  virtually  all  of  our  resources—are  going  into  the  other 
25  percent.  There  is  nothing  written  in  the  book  that  says  that  a 
small  jet  or  some  large  propeller  plane  or  a  single-engine  plane 
can’t do catastrophic damage. Now, it’s a question in some cases of 
fuel—the  larger  the  plane,  the  more  fuel,  therefore  there’s  an  in-
stinct to go to the larger plane because it will carry more fuel. And 
the  other  one  would  be—a  smaller  plane  could  be  carrying  some-
thing  which  was  an  explosive  device  that  had  nothing  to  do  with 
fuel, but had its own timing system and all of the rest of it. What, 
in  fact,  is  being  done  by  the  general  aviation  community,  in  your 
judgment,  and  what  do  you  think  that  we  need  to  do,  if  you  have 
the  resources?  No—what  do  we  need  to  do  as  a  government  in 
terms of general aviation? And do you have the resources to do the 
Government’s part? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  do  understand  your  question,  and  I  don’t  think 
there  is  a—there’s  not  a  classified  problem—so  if  I’m  not  answer-
ing, it’s not that. 

I know what you’re talking about, I think it is something we take 
very  seriously.  Secretary  Chertoff  has  it  very  high  on  his  radar. 
And  so  our  approach  is,  ‘‘Let’s  get  incremental,’’—we’ve  got  to  do 
a serious job of securing that so-called supply chain, as well as the 
other. 

And  it  is  a  very  different,  different  bird,  as  you  say,  given  that 
there are many, many, many small—and we’ve started with the ap-
proach of securing the physical airport itself. We also screen the pi-
lots, individuals who are certified to fly them. And we’re getting at 
it from that perspective. 

The  question  we  need  to  work  out  with  the  community  is,  what 
is  the  security  benefit  of  screening  every  individual  passenger  in 
some  format?  It’s  sort  of  like  hazmat  trucking,  that  if  you  say  ter-
rorists  are  only  going  to  use  trucks  that  are  certified  for  hazmat, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31

then  you’re  not  cognizant  of  the  fact  that,  well,  heck  they  could  go 
steal  one  that’s  not  hazmat  and  put  hazmat  in  it  because  they’re 
not  afraid  of  violating  the  law.  So,  you  have  to,  you  have  to  look 
at, at the whole picture. 

And  I  would  expect  that  we’ll  have  a  more  robust  plan  to  come 
back  here  to  you  with,  it’s  something  we’re  working  on  now,  we’re 
studying  that  through  2008,  but  we  absolutely  understand  the 
other point that, that you were making. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. But it’s three-quarters of all flights. What 
is the difference between me—if I were to be some danger—getting 
onto a commercial flight, which is 25 percent, or getting onto a gen-
eral aviation flight, which is 75 percent? Why would one be locked 
down  completely?  And  I  think  you’ve  done  a  very  good  job  at  in-
creasing security and making it—I’ve been very impressed by your 
screeners.  I  don’t  understand  how  they’ve  gotten  better.  It’s  too 
easy  to  say  that  they  have  gotten  better.  I  think  you’re  right—
they’re  both  polite  and  they’re  tough.  And,  yes,  lines  have  been 
sometimes, and that’s part of what security’s about. 

But  the  75  percent—if  an  enemy,  particularly  an  Al  Qaeda-type 
enemy—they always look for the soft places. Now, they look for the 
dramatic places—the Twin Towers—or they look for the soft places. 
One of the two. General aviation is one of the soft places. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  OK.  Secretary  Chertoff’s  risk  basis—you’ve  got  the 
large  aircraft  for  use  as  a  weapon,  use  it  as—blow  it  up.  One  of 
the  impacts  on  the  ‘‘blow  it  up’’  is  on  the  total  network.  So  that  if 
aircraft  are  being  attacked  by  terrorists,  that  will  have  an  impact 
on  the  total  network  of  commercial  aviation,  and  less  so—less  net-
work effect in general aviation. 

So,  in  terms  of  differences,  there  isn’t—apart  from  those  which 
you  already  addressed—that  would  be  the  principal  difference.  So 
while  they’re  numerically  more,  their  network  effect  is  less.  But 
then  when  you  go  to  your  other  payload—so  to  speak—scenario, 
then that pops up on the consequence chart of very, very high, and 
that—that is the piece of general aviation that we’re focused on, is 
to hit that high consequences piece. 

Senator ROCKEFELLER. What should they be doing? 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  The  basics  of  securing  the  aircraft,  observing  any-
thing out of the ordinary—all of those basics are remarkably effec-
tive, at virtually no cost. So that is the basic. 

We’re  doing  more  in  the  screening,  we’re  doing  more  vetting  of 
the  FAA  lists,  so  we  have  a  certain  requirement  that  is,  maybe 
yearly,  but  we’re  doing  it  much,  much  more  than  that.  So,  we’re 
able  to  catch  if  anybody  has  changed  on  the  list  from  when  it  was 
originally done. 

So  there  will  be  a  big  cliff  when  it  goes  from  those  kind  of  solu-
tions  to  the,  ‘‘OK,  now  we  gotta  physically  screen  people  who  are 
getting onboard the flight.’’ So, there is a classified element of this, 
but I think you’ve posed the policy issue squarely, which is: We can 
do the things that are relatively easy and not expensive, but there 
is a big next step that will cost to take. And I think that is—that’s 
the issue that you’re highlighting. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  Is  your  expectation  that  we  will  come  to 

that point within the next several years? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32

Mr.  HAWLEY.  You  know,  I  don’t  know  on  the  issue  of  passenger 
screening.  If  it  turns  out  that  that  is  the  way  to  address  the  high 
consequence,  then  absolutely.  But  what  we’re  going  to  figure  out, 
what we’re working on, is how do we address the high consequence 
if  it’s  screening?  If  it’s  something  else,  then  that’s  where  we’ll  go. 
Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  OK.  A  final  question,  and  I  have  some 
that  I  want  to  submit  to  you  and  I  have  one  announcement  that 
I have to make. 

With  respect  to  the  screeners,  I’m  actually—it’s  a  quizzical  mat-
ter. Because I can remember, we started with one set of screeners, 
and then we made a very large change, and many of them left, and 
new  ones  were  brought  in,  and  there  wasn’t  really  any  difference 
in the quality of their work—this was some time ago. 

Now,  suddenly,  things  have  gotten  a  lot  better.  Now,  what  do  I 
mean  by  that?  What  I  mean  is,  that  they  take  their  time,  they’re 
polite.  That  if  you  have  a  three-ounce  or  less  bottle  of  fluid,  they 
find that in their screening devices. Even if it’s in the carry-on bag, 
they find that, they take it out. They say, ‘‘This is OK but it should 
be  in  a  plastic  wrapper,’’  and  in  other  words,  that  kind  of  care  is, 
to me, very obviously present now. 

But  I  would  suspect  that,  if  TSA  were  to  take  a  group  of  their 
employees,  and  to  send  them  through  the  screening  process  with, 
you know, malevolent material on them, that a lot them would get 
through. And I suspect that would be the case. 

So,  the  question  is,  when  you’re  talking  about  improving  their 
nature—I  and  others  can  be,  you  know,  we  can  be  persuaded  by 
the friendliness, the toughness, the precision, their patience—all of 
those  things  which  I  think  are  remarkable—politeness  which  is 
very,  very  hard  at  the  end  of  the  day.  But,  in  the  final  analysis, 
if  the  sort  of  the  quiet  testing  that  I’m  sure  goes  on  in  TSA—run-
ning  people  through,  deliberately  carrying  things  that  should  be 
caught,  and  sometimes  aren’t  caught  or  often  are  not  caught,  then 
that’s a very different result. 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Totally  agree.  We  are—we  have  the  base  level  of 
testing  that  everybody’s  familiar  with  in  terms  of  the  x-ray  tests, 
and we do covert testing. We also do take the security officers and 
have  them  do  exactly  what  you  described,  sometimes  at  other  air-
ports where they’re not recognized. 

But we are rolling out a program in 2007 that is directly related 
to  that,  in  terms  of  doing  the  IED  component  test  kits.  To  have 
them deployed at the check points, where they will work with them 
all day and test, and peer test, with each other. It is the ability to 
find  the  detonator,  the  individual  piece  of  an  IED,  that  is  the 
standard. 

And  that’s  the  principal  thing  that’s  changed  since  before  9/11. 
Is that now it is, a very tough standard. But the training is far ad-
vanced,  and  I  believe  our  workforce  steps  up  to  that.  But  we’re—
one  of  the  reasons  that  we’re  deploying  these  kits  in  a  widespread 
manner  is  to  be  able  to  build  up  the  database.  Because  when  you 
do individual covert testing, you know, in a system like ours, you’re 
not  statistically  significant.  So,  if  we  can  get  out  twelve  or  fifteen 
hundred  of  these  and  build  up  the  test  scores,  then  we  really  can 
come  back  here  with  statistically  significant  data  that  will  be  able 
to demonstrate progress, or non-progress. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  All  right.  I  have  five  more  questions 
which I’m going to submit to you in writing, but we’ve been joined 
by Senator Carper. And I want to welcome you, Senator Carper, to 
the  Committee.  You’re  a  superb  member,  even  though  you  haven’t 
opened  your  mouth  yet,  because  I  know  you  very  well,  and  you 
were born in West Virginia, which gets you a few extra points. And 
we welcome whatever questions you may have. 

STATEMENT OF HON. THOMAS R. CARPER,

U.S. SENATOR FROM DELAWARE 

Senator  CARPER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I’m  honored  to  be 
here. Maybe I shouldn’t open my mouth, and then people will think 
I really know something. 

This  falls  under  the  rubric  of  ‘‘all  politics  is  local,’’  but  in  my 
state, one of the issues I focus a fair amount on is affordable hous-
ing. I’m a huge proponent of home ownership. And one of the com-
panies  that’s  been  especially  supportive  of  that  over  the  years  is  a 
company called Leon Wiener and Associates. 

Leon  Wiener,  who  is  the  founder  of  the  company,  passed  away 
a  couple  of  years  ago,  and  it’s  now  run  by  a  fellow  named  Kevin 
Kelley. 

Kevin’s  a  name  as  close  to  that  of  somebody  that’s  on  a  watch 
list from the IRA, and for some time, when he’s gone to the airport 
to catch a flight to go to one place or the other, he ends up not get-
ting to fly, or at least delayed. 

I  don’t  know  about  you,  but  when  I  go  to  airports—and  Senator 
Rockefeller, this may be for you too—I usually get there in a hurry, 
I  don’t  have  much  time  to  go  through  the  screening.  I  do,  like  ev-
erybody  else,  but  it’s  a  rush  situation.  And  I’m  trying  to  make  my 
flights,  and  make  my  connecting  flights,  and  I  can’t  imagine  what 
it’s  like  to  be  who  you  are—who  you  say  you  are—actually  be  an 
upstanding citizen within your state, and to face these delays over 
and over again. 

He’s  not  the  only  one.  He’s  not  the  only  one  in  my  state,  and  I 
suspect  you  heard  from  others.  I’m  told  Senator  Lott  may  have 
talked about his wife this morning facing a similar situation. 

And  as,  on  the  one  hand,  we  try  to  be  careful  and  cautious  and 
enhance  security  on  our  flights,  we  also  want  to  do  whatever  we 
can to make sure that we’re not inconveniencing—needlessly incon-
veniencing—people.  Like,  whether  it’s  Mrs.  Lott,  or  whether  it’s 
Kevin Kelley, or a whole lot of other people. 

I  suspect  you  already  responded  to  this  question,  this  issue,  but 
for  me—would  you  just  restate  what,  what  we’re  doing  to  get  this 
resolved, and soon? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Sure. First off, I do understand that it is a pain for 
an  awful  lot  of  people,  and  that  is  something  that  I  hear  about  a 
lot, and it’s something that we work on a lot. And so, I guess I un-
derstand the question. 

The  answer  is,  that  in  the  next  year  we  will  get  Secure  Flight 

deployed, and that problem will then go away. 

Senator  CARPER.  When  you  say  next  year—early  next  year?  The 

middle of next year? The end of next year? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  would  say  by  New  Year’s  Eve  is  what  I  would 
sign  up  for,  and  then  whatever  we  can  do  faster.  It  would  be  de-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34

pending on the comments that we get. This is principally the notice 
of  proposed  rulemaking  (NPRM),  and  the  comment  period,  and 
what comments we get, and how long that takes. 

Senator CARPER. I want to make sure I understand it. When you 

say by next—by New Year’s Eve of this year? 

Mr. HAWLEY. Of 2008. 
Senator CARPER. So that would be almost 2 years away. 
Mr.  HAWLEY.  That’s,  yes,  so.  Let  me  go  back  to  the—so,  that 
brings up the question: OK, that’s a long time—what are we doing 
about it in the meantime? 

And  the  first  thing  we’ve  done  is  scrub  the  list.  And  we’ve  gone 
over  every  name  on  the  No  Fly  List.  And  we’ll  have  that  review 
complete  here  in  the  next  couple  of  months,  and  that  will  reduce 
the  No  Fly  List  to  the  bare  minimum  of  people  who  really,  really 
today  represent  the  threat.  And  that’s  going  to  be  on  the  order  of 
magnitude  of  about  a  half.  So  that  itself  will  reduce  the  problem. 
The second piece is redress, where we now have gotten the proc-
ess  from  a  paper,  60-day  process,  to  an  electronic  10-day  process 
to  get  on  the  cleared  list,  where  we  circulate  to  the  airlines  and 
say,  ‘‘Hey,  this  is  the  guy  who’s  not  the  terrorist,  let  him  go 
through.’’

The  problem  that  your  friend  is  having—and  a  lot  of  people  are 
having—is  that  there  are  different  airline  systems  who  are  able  to 
use the cleared list in—to different degrees of effectiveness. So, the 
problem  is  isolated  to,  ‘‘Can  I  get  my  boarding  pass  at  home,  or 
print it off at the kiosk?’’ Those are the two areas where you’re im-
pacted.  So,  if  the  airline  can’t  clear  you  in  their  system,  those  are 
the  two  places  it  fits.  And  the  trade-off  for  that  is,  we  have  a  very 
good system of keeping people who are on the watch list off planes. 
Senator CARPER. What do we need to do to help expedite this so-

lution? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  I  think  a  lot  of  the  responsibility,  frankly,  is  on 
TSA to prove that the privacy protections are robust and real. And 
I  think  a  lot  of  questions  have  been  raised  as  to  our  trust-
worthiness  on  that.  And  that’s  where  we  spent  a  large  part  of  the 
last  year—re-baselining,  rebuilding  the  program.  So,  we’ve  now 
done it to our satisfaction, and now comes the process of convincing 
GAO and the public that it is as robust as we think it is. 

Senator  CARPER.  Second  question.  In  Northern  Delaware  we 
have  an  airport,  it’s  about  30,  35  miles  away  from  Philadelphia 
International.  Philadelphia  International  is  one  of  the  busiest  air-
ports  in  the  country  now,  and  frankly  one  of  the  airports  with  the 
longest delays. They have huge problems with congestion, there are 
airplanes trying to get in and out of Philadelphia. 

With  that  in  mind,  at  least  one  national  carrier—international 
carrier,  Delta,  has  decided  to  operate  flights  out  of  New  Castle 
County  Airport,  just  south  of  Wilmington,  Delaware  to  provide  the 
direct  flights  to  Atlanta.  And  the  service  is  actually  quite  well-re-
ceived, and our expectations is that they’re probably going to build 
on that. 

But getting federalized screening at the airport has been—as you 
may  know—difficult.  And  I  just  want  to  ask,  what  was  the  reason 
for  the  initial  decision  not  to  federalize  the  airport  in  time  for  the 
start of passenger service to Atlanta? Any ideas on that? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes.  It  is  a  widespread  issue  for  us.  It  does  get  to 
the resource base of saying, at what point are we deploying further 
TSA  screeners  around  the  country  to  smaller  airports?  And  what 
we find is that when we do that, service is initiated—a lot of times 
service  then  decreases,  or  leaves,  and  then  we’ve  got  our  TSA  peo-
ple  stuck  there.  And  the  really  hard  problem  is  when  it’s  reduced, 
because you can’t pull them out totally, and once you federalize, it’s 
hard not to. 

So,  we’re  looking—and  I’m  familiar  with  Wilmington—but  as  an 
overall  system,  one  of  the  things  we’ve  talked  to  airlines  and  air-
ports  about,  is  using  the  privatization  option  for  the  smaller  air-
ports,  where  you  can  have  an  arrangement  with  your  local  sheriff, 
or  other  local  people,  where  we  can  deputize  to  do  the  screening. 
And  that  way  we  don’t  have  to  put  full-time  TSA  people,  but  you 
still  get  your  federalized  screening,  and  can  fly  into  the  sterile 
area,  the  big  airports.  So,  I  think  that  is  a  very  promising  way  to 
deal  with  it  that  doesn’t  drain  TSA  resources,  but  keeps  the  secu-
rity. 

Senator  CARPER.  My  time’s  expired,  I’m  going  to  submit  one,  at 
least  one  question  for  the  record,  just  to  follow  up  on  private——

Senator ROCKEFELLER. Go ahead, Senator. Take your time. 
Senator CARPER. OK, thank you. 
When it appeared that the New Castle County Airport would not 
receive TSA screeners, apparently they explored contracting with a 
private company. And I’m told that bids were tough to come by be-
cause  of  the  small  size  of  the  service  needed,  as  well  as,  I  guess, 
liability  issues  that  were  raised.  And  so,  I’ll  just  go  back  at  this  a 
little  different  way  and  ask,  how  has  the  TSA  addressed  the  prob-
lem  that  we  faced  in  Delaware  when  looking  to  contract  security? 
And what, if any, changes have been made? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Well,  we  just  announced  one  in  New  York  where 
it  was  a  three-party  deal,  and  that’s  what  we’re  looking  for.  And 
if  the  bid  is—‘‘find  me  an  agency  to  bid  on  it,’’  that’s  going  to  be 
harder  than,  ‘‘find  me  some  off-duty  police  officers  who  are  going 
to be around the airport anyway,’’ and we can, you know—they can 
earn a little extra money and provide additional service. 

So,  I  think  that  the  second—identifying  individuals  who  are  in 
the community anyway is a profitable way to go. So, Mo McGowan 
right here, runs that part of the world, so we’ll go huddle after this. 

Senator CARPER. Say the name of the person again? 
Mr. HAWLEY. Mo——
Senator CARPER. Mo——
Mr. HAWLEY. McGowan, over there in the red tie. 
Senator  CARPER.  Thank  you,  thanks  so  much.  Thanks,  Mr. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  He  probably  has  problems  going  through 

Chairman. 

passenger screening, too. 

Senator  CARPER.  With  a  name  like  Mo  McGowan,  do  you  think? 
Senator ROCKEFELLER. Yes. 
Senator  CARPER.  I  hope  not,  because  it’s  a  theme.  Hey,  Mo.  No, 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  I  guess  the  final  words  I’d  say  is  that, 
there  are  a  lot  of  things  we  have  yet  to  discuss.  And  you  will—I 

Mo. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36

hope  you’ll  answer  my  questions,  and  I  hope  we’ll  continue  meet-
ing. 

I  think  it  needs  to  be  said  that—at  least  in  this  Senator’s  judg-
ment—you’re doing an extremely good job. And the relationship be-
tween  leadership  over  at  TSA,  and  what  happens  at  TSA,  is  obvi-
ously  enormous.  In  that  9/11  could  be  repeated  in  some  form  al-
most  any  day,  again,  there’s  an  instinct  on  our  part  to  push,  to 
push, to push. And I would just say that as we’re pushing, it would 
be my feeling that you’re trying to do as much as you possibly can. 
But for heaven’s sake, don’t bypass anything. 

If  it  takes  me  missing  my  airplane  or  somebody  having  the 
wrong  name  and  not  being  able  to  get  on,  then  let  that  be  as  you 
work out the wrinkles in that system, because it has to be as flaw-
less as it can be. 

Final  question—are  there  any  areas—I  mean  it  is  generally  un-
derstood  in  the  Congress  that  there’s  been  so  much  attention  on 
wars  overseas,  and  not  really  enough  attention  on  the  war  on  ter-
ror overseas, or the war on terror and what it could do in this coun-
try—and  that  is  where  Homeland  Security  as  a  department  comes 
in.  I  think  Michael  Chertoff  is  doing  a  very  good  job,  however,  I 
think  there’s  universal  agreement  that  Homeland  Security  is  un-
derfunded. And I think it’s incumbent upon those who come before 
us  to  tell  us  if  they  think  some  part  of  their  part  of  that  program 
is  being  underfunded.  Because  the  security  of  Americans  is  far 
more related to the work of Homeland Security than it is to what’s 
going on in Iraq. At least that’s my point of view. 

So,  if  you  put  yourself  at  the  top  of  the  heap,  then  you’ve  got  to 
be  aggressive  about  asking  for  funding  where  you  think  you  don’t 
have  enough.  Senator  Carper  indicated  that,  ‘‘Gee,  that’s  2  years 
away.’’  Maybe  it’s  really  important  that  it  be  1  year  away,  and  it 
could be if you had more funding. Or maybe it’s not because you’re 
simply working on technology and the rest of it. Could you be forth-
right with us on the matter of adequacy of funding, or not? 

Mr.  HAWLEY.  Yes,  sir.  And  I  believe  all  the  pressure  I  get  from 
Secretary Chertoff is along the lines you mentioned of—it’s security 
first, this is the mission and we’ve got to be direct—and to me say-
ing,  ‘‘You’ve  got  to  be  direct  in  saying  this  is  what  it  takes  to  do 
this.’’  And  then  have  the  discussion  up  front  that  says,  ‘‘Do  we 
want to do it or not?’’ And if we’re going to do it, we’ve got to fund 
it. So, clearly that is the philosophy of the Department. 

On  Secure  Flight,  we  are  looking  at  exactly  that  question,  what 
would  it  take  to  move  it  up  significantly  from  what  I’ve  just  de-
scribed?  And  budget  is  not  in  that  discussion  yet.  So,  we’re  going 
to  figure  out  what  it  is,  and  then  we’ll  have  the  budget  conversa-
tion. 

So,  and  particularly  on  the  issue  of  TSOs,  we’re  dialed  into  that 
as  well.  So,  we  will  be  candid  on  that—there  are  obviously  budget 
requirements  that  we  respect,  and  I  know  the  Congress  respects. 
So—but  it’s  a  policy  issue,  and  we  will  certainly  surface  those 
issues. 

Senator  ROCKEFELLER.  That’s  very  important.  And  I  thank  you 

very much for your appearance. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37

I wish to say, on behalf of Chairman Inouye, that our next hear-
ing is at 10 a.m. on Thursday, January 18th, and it will be on sur-
face transportation security. Thank you, Mr. Hawley. 

Mr. HAWLEY. Yes, sir. Thank you. 
[Whereupon, at 11:48 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X

NATIONAL AIR TRANSPORTATION ASSOCIATION (NATA) 

Alexandria, VA, January 17, 2007

Hon. DANIEL K. INOUYE,
Chairman,
Hon. TED STEVENS,
Vice Chairman,
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC.
Dear Chairman Inouye and Vice Chairman Stevens:

The  National  Air  Transportation  Association  (NATA),  the  voice  of  aviation  busi-
ness, is the public policy group representing the interests of aviation businesses be-
fore Congress, Federal agencies and state governments. NATA’s 2,000 member com-
panies  own,  operate  and  service  aircraft.  These  companies  provide  for  the  needs  of 
the  traveling  public  by  offering  services  and  products  to  aircraft  operators  and  oth-
ers such as fuel sales, aircraft maintenance, parts sales, storage, rental, airline serv-
icing,  flight  training,  Part  135  on-demand  air  charter,  fractional  aircraft  program 
management  and  scheduled  commuter  operations  in  smaller  aircraft.  NATA  mem-
bers are a vital link in the aviation industry providing services to the general public, 
airlines, general aviation and the military. 

On behalf of NATA and its 2,000 members, I am writing to express concerns with 
legislation  that  would  have  a  significant  negative  economic  impact  on  hundreds  of 
aviation  ground  service  providers  across  the  country.  H.R.  1,  passed  by  the  U.S. 
House  of  Representatives  last  week,  includes  a  provision  that  would  direct  the  De-
partment  of  Homeland  Security  to  issue  a  rule  that  would  require  the  screening  of 
all  air  cargo  carried  aboard  passenger  aircraft  within  3  years.  Such  a  requirement, 
without  significant  increases  in  Federal  funds  to  accomplish  this  goal,  will  lead  to 
unbearable increases in costs for companies who provide ground support to commer-
cial air carriers. 

The  language  included  in  H.R.  1  constitutes  an  unfunded  mandate,  and  rep-
resents  a  dramatic  reversal  in  current  DHS  policy,  which  assesses  security  initia-
tives through a risk-based approach. Currently, technology does not exist that would 
allow  all  cargo  carried  aboard  passenger  aircraft  to  be  screened  in  a  manner  that 
does  not  significantly  disrupt  the  flow  of  commerce.  Before  directing  airlines  and 
ground  service  providers  to  comply  with  such  a  massive  initiative,  Congress  must 
first  invest  in  technologies  that  will  streamline  the  cargo  screening  process.  An 
across-the-board proposal to scan all cargo within such a small time-frame, however, 
directs vital resources away from critical DHS programs, forcing the Department to 
spend  a  disproportionate  amount  of  time  on  one  particular  aspect  of  aviation  secu-
rity. 

I  am  pleased  that  the  Senate  is  taking  a  different  approach  from  the  House  to 
such important legislation, starting with today’s hearing regarding the recommenda-
tions  of  the  9/11  Commission.  The  legislation  considered  in  the  House  was  passed 
with  no  committee  input  and  no  opportunity  for  amendment.  It  is  imperative  that 
such  a  vital  piece  of  legislation  go  through  the  standard  legislative  process,  so  pro-
posals can be properly vetted and examined, and other alternatives can be debated. 
Today’s  hearing  regarding  the  recommendations  of  the  9/11  Commission  is  a  step 
in the right direction. 

As  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation  begins  discussion 
today on improvements to aviation security, I ask that the Senate take a more rea-
sonable,  risk-based  approach  to  improving  air  cargo  security.  Aviation  ground  serv-
ice providers are eager to assist in developing reasonable, long-term solutions to im-
proving  all  aspects  of  aviation  security,  including  further  measures  to  secure  air 
cargo  aboard  passenger  aircraft.  The  best  long-term  solution  to  screening  air  cargo 
should  begin  with  Federal  investment  in  technologies  that  will  make  cargo  screen-

(39)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40

ing  more  precise  and  more  efficient.  Should  Congress  direct  the  Transportation  Se-
curity  Administration  to  increase  the  amount  of  air  cargo  screened,  those  increases 
should  be  directed  based  on  risk  rather  than  a  ‘‘one-size-fits-all’’  solution,  and  they 
should  be  accompanied  with  appropriate  Federal  funds  to  allow  airline  service  pro-
viders the opportunity to invest in additional infrastructure to meet the needs of the 
new requirements. 

Thank you for your attention to this important issue. 

Sincerely, 

JAMES K. COYNE, 

President. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  The  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  has  recommended  that 
the  TSA  assess  the  feasibility,  expected  benefits  and  costs  of  replacing  Explosive 
Trace  Detection  (ETD)  machines  with  stand-alone  Explosive  Detection  System 
(EDS) machines for primary screening. Has the TSA completed such an assessment? 
Answer. In February 2006, the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) de-
livered  to  Congress  a  Strategic  Planning  Framework  for  the  Electronic  Baggage 
Screening  Program  (EBSP).  This  framework  details  TSA’s  long-term  planning  phi-
losophy for the development and implementation of optimal baggage screening solu-
tions at the Nation’s top 250 airports, where over 99 percent checked baggage origi-
nates,  and  currently  guides  TSA’s  investment  and  deployment  decisions.  The  plan 
does  include  replacement  of  ETD  with  EDS  at  many  medium  and  small  airports. 
However,  the  volume  of  checked  baggage  at  the  remaining  airports  would  not  sup-
port  the  capital  investment  that  would  be  required  for  an  EDS  installation.  The 
plan examines a variety of baggage screening configurations and matches those con-
figurations to airport operational designs and needs. 
The plan also includes the following key elements:
• Funding prioritization schedule.
• Deployment  strategy  (includes  a  strategy  to  expedite  the  deployment  of  in-line 
• EDS life-cycle management plan.
• Stakeholder collaboration plan.
Question 2. When does the TSA anticipate completely phasing out ETD machines 

EDS systems, where an in-line solution is appropriate to an airport).

at all but the smallest airports? 

Answer. In February 2006, the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) de-
livered  to  Congress  a  Strategic  Planning  Framework  for  the  Electronic  Baggage 
Screening  Program  (EBSP).  This  framework  details  TSA’s  long-term  planning  phi-
losophy for the development and implementation of optimal baggage screening solu-
tions at the Nation’s top 250 airports, where over 99 percent checked baggage origi-
nates, and currently guides TSA’s investment and deployment decisions. 

The plan does include replacement of ETD with EDS at many medium and small 
airports.  However,  the  volume  of  checked  baggage  at  the  remaining  airports  would 
not  support  the  capital  investment  that  would  be  required  for  an  Explosives  Detec-
tion  System  (EDS)  installation.  Explosives  Trace  Detection  (ETD)  equipment  would 
remain  at  these  airports  as  the  primary  checked  baggage  screening  solution.  Addi-
tionally,  ETDs  would  remain  at  airports  with  EDS  solutions  for  secondary  checked 
baggage  screening.  The  plan  estimates  that  by  2019  the  optimal  screening  systems 
will be installed at all airports.

Question 3. What level of staff savings have been achieved since March 2005 from 

replacing stand-alone EDS machines with in-line EDS machines? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) has identified six air-
ports  that  converted  to  in-line  baggage  systems  during  this  period:  two  Category  X 
airports  (Hartsfield-Jackson  Atlanta  International  Airport  and  McCarran  Inter-
national Airport), three Category I airports (Austin-Bergstrom International Airport, 
Bob  Hope  Airport,  and  Metropolitan  Oakland  International),  and  one  Category  II 
airport (Richmond International Airport). 

The  aggregated  Full  Time  Equivalent  (FTE)  reduction  from  Staffing  Allocation 
Model  (SAM)  2006  to  SAM  2007  is  318  FTE.  Of  this  number,  60  percent  left  the 
TSA workforce through attrition. The remaining positions, based on historical rates, 
should leave by the end of the Fiscal Year 2007.

Question  4.  How  is  the  TSA  selecting  and  prioritizing  its  R&D  projects  for  avia-

tion checkpoint security? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  uses  a  risk-based  ap-
proach  to  identify  its  Research  &  Development  (R&D)  requirements.  TSA  assesses 
its  current  capabilities  and  the  effectiveness  against  identified  risks,  including  an 
assessment of the latest intelligence information. The primary focus for R&D efforts 
related  to  checkpoint  security  technology  has  been  to  increase  explosives  detection 
capabilities. Working with the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) Science and 
Technology Directorate (S&T), TSA ensures its R&D priorities are incorporated into 
the overall DHS R&D program.

Question 5. Do you have any specific evidence or statistics demonstrating that the 
investment in R&D for checkpoints has been effective and has addressed the highest 
priorities? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  identified  the 
need  for  technologies  and  procedures  that  will  assist  in  the  identification  of  explo-
sives. This is the highest priority for aviation checkpoints, and TSA has been work-
ing with the Department of Homeland Security, Science and Technology Directorate 
(DHS  S&T)  to  address  this  priority.  The  development  of  technology  solutions  has 
been  challenging,  in  that  the  systems  must  be  able  to  effectively  detect  explosives 
and  ensure  that  the  flow  of  passengers  is  not  delayed.  TSA  believes  that  previous 
investments  in  the  area  of  R&D  will  support  a  significant  increase  in  systems 
deployable  in  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2007.  For  example,  one  of  the  solutions  to  be  evalu-
ated  is  technology  to  support  the  identification  of  those  who  might  portray  ‘‘hostile 
intent’’  as  they  approach  the  screening  process.  Use  of  closed  circuit  TV  cameras, 
along  with  individuals  trained  in  recognition  of  signs  of  ‘‘hostile  intent,’’  will  allow 
TSA to direct those individuals to a more intense screening process.

Question  6.  Are  these  priorities  being  acted  on  by  the  Department  of  Homeland 
Security  (DHS)  Science  and  Technology  Directorate  (S&T)  and  the  Transportation 
Security Lab? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  been  working 
closely  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  Science  and  Technology  Direc-
torate (S&T) to prepare several new technologies for operational testing and evalua-
tion (OT&E). With the continued lab support from DHS S&T, TSA has recently ini-
tiated an OT&E pilot using whole body imaging systems and will soon be initiating 
OT&E pilots using cast and prosthetics scanners for people, as well as bottled liquid 
scanners,  automated  explosives  detection  systems  and  advanced  x-ray  technologies 
for  carry-on  items  in  Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2007.  Efforts  undertaken  by  S&T  to  identify 
a  method  to  detect  the  possible  presence  of  ‘‘hostile  intent’’  within  the  population 
approaching the screening process will afford TSA another potential solution to sup-
port a systems approach to security screening.

Question 7. What is the status of the rapid-response task force convened by Admi-
ral  Jay  Cohen,  Under  Secretary  of  the  Science  and  Technology  Directorate,  to  ad-
dress  the  detection  technology  gap  exposed  by  the  foiled  liquid  explosives  plot  in 
London? 

Answer. Based on the Department of Homeland Security, Science and Technology 
Directorate’s  (S&T)  ongoing  efforts,  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA) will begin conducting airport demonstrations using bottled liquid scanners in 
the  coming  months.  TSA  and  S&T  will  share  performance  data  gathered  during 
these  demonstrations  to  determine  the  extent  to  which  a  technology  solution  is 
ready  for  wide-scale  purchase  and  deployment.  While  these  demonstrations  are  un-
derway  TSA  continues  to  implement  several  security  procedures  that  address  the 
vulnerability  identified  by  the  incident  in  London  including  the  limitation  of  the 
amounts of liquids that passengers are permitted to carry on-board an aircraft.

Question 8. What is the status of the DHS testing efforts—through the Transpor-
tation  Security  Lab—to  develop  a  liquid  explosive  detection  technology,  and  what 
steps has the TSA taken to address this vulnerability? 

Answer. Based on the Department of Homeland Security, Science and Technology 
Directorate’s  (S&T)  ongoing  efforts,  TSA  will  begin  conducting  airport  demonstra-
tions  using  bottled  liquid  scanners  in  the  coming  months.  TSA  and  S&T  will  share 
performance  data  gathered  during  these  demonstrations  to  determine  the  extent  to 
which a technology solution is ready for wide-scale purchase and deployment. 

In the interim, TSA has implemented several security procedures that address the 
vulnerability  associated  with  the  identification  of  liquid  explosives.  Beginning  Au-
gust  10,  2006,  TSA  implemented  restrictions  on  the  carriage  of  liquids,  gels,  and 
aerosols  into  the  sterile  area  and  onboard  aircraft.  Except  for  exempt  items  (baby 
formula/milk/breast  milk/food,  medications,  and  liquids/gels  required  for  medical 
purposes), all liquids, gels, and aerosols must be placed in travel size containers (3.4 
oz/100ml)  that  fit  comfortably  into  a  single,  sealed,  quart-size  plastic  bag.  All  liq-
uids,  gels,  and  aerosols  (including  exempt  items)  are  x-rayed  and  physically  exam-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42

ined  by  Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSOs).  Additionally,  randomly  chosen 
samples  of  passengers’  quart-size  plastic  bags  are  subjected  to  screening  using  ex-
plosives  trace  detectors  (ETD)  at  each  checkpoint.  New  training  requirements  have 
been  established  to  cover  the  additional  screening  procedures  associated  with  this 
threat. 

TSA uses a layered approach to security at checkpoints, and technology is just one 
component  in  the  strategy.  TSA  has  modified  existing  technologies  and  developed 
procedures at the checkpoint to successfully detect explosives. Key to the successful 
detection of explosives is the TSOs. TSOs have received training in explosive detec-
tion  and  have  demonstrated  proficiency.  On  the  personnel  front,  TSA  has  invested 
resources  in  developing,  implementing,  and  training  TSOs  in  order  to  augment  the 
current  technology  available.  On  the  technology  side,  we  have  made  modifications 
to the technology. Therefore, existing technology solutions are being used more effec-
tively  and  efficiently  to  meet  TSA  security  goals  through  better  trained  TSOs  and 
equipment modifications. The prohibited items list was modified to reduce the num-
ber  of  items  TSOs  are  looking  for  to  allow  them  to  concentrate  technology  more  on 
explosives. TSOs are also trained in behavioral recognition and bomb appraisal. Ca-
nines  provide  a  visible,  unpredictable  deterrence  in  and  around  the  checkpoint  and 
also have detection capability. All things considered, TSA has successfully deployed 
checkpoint technologies to address vulnerabilities in a layered security system.

Question  9.  Could  you  update  us  on  the  status  of  any  plans  the  agency  has  to 
lease  equipment,  rather  than  buy  it,  and  the  impact  that  leasing  may  have  on  the 
cost of acquiring and maintaining screening technologies over time? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  worked  in  collabora-
tion  with  aviation  industry  stakeholders  to  develop  a  cost-sharing  formula  that  re-
flects  the  benefits  each  party  derives  from  the  installation  of  the  optimal  baggage 
screening solution, including national security benefits and labor and other cost sav-
ings. The Baggage Screening Investment Study (BSIS) was sent to Congress in Feb-
ruary  2007,  which  TSA  is  now  evaluating.  In  addition  to  the  recommendations  in 
the  BSIS,  TSA  plans  to  continue  to  engage  industry  and  the  Administration  to  ex-
amine various leasing and service contract options to potentially reduce the Federal 
burden of purchasing and maintaining explosives detection systems (EDS).

Question  10.  The  GAO  has  reported  in  the  past  that  the  TSA’s  coordination  with 
other  Federal  agencies  and  outreach  to  transportation  industry  association  stake-
holders  has  been  limited.  What  actions  has  the  TSA  taken  to  improve  coordination 
with the aviation community? 

Answer.  In  an  effort  to  centralize  and  improve  the  Transportation  Security  Ad-
ministration’s  (TSA)  outreach  efforts  to  the  transportation  industry  and  create  a 
focal  point  for  inter-agency  coordination,  the  Office  of  Transportation  Sector  Net-
work Management (TSNM) was established in late 2005. With ten distinct transpor-
tation modes identified within TSNM, three were specific to the aviation sector: Air-
lines, Airports, and General Aviation. In addition, TSNM-International works close-
ly  with  the  aviation  community.  General  Manager  (GM)  positions  were  created  to 
lead  each  office  to  improve  communication  and  present  a  more  consistent  and  fo-
cused  message  to  both  industry  and  other  government  agencies.  They  are  charged 
with  conducting  outreach  and  participating  in  a  variety  of  industry  sponsored 
events. 

TSNM-Airports  maintains  a  high  profile  with  its  stakeholders,  including  those 
within the Federal Government, at other levels of government, and among its indus-
try  stakeholders.  In  particular,  with  a  population  of  over  450  regulated  airports  of 
varying sizes and complexities under its purview, TSNM-Airports has established a 
robust and effective partnership with several key commercial airport industry asso-
ciations, including the Airports Council International-North America and the Amer-
ican Association of Airport Executives. Through daily contacts, TSNM-Airports com-
municates  timely  information  effectively  among  the  full  range  of  industry  stake-
holders.  Aside  from  the  ongoing  daily  dialog,  TSNM-Airports  conducts  a  monthly 
conference  call  from  TSA  Headquarters  offices  in  Arlington,  Virginia,  attended  by 
representatives  from  both  associations.  These  calls  typically  include  the  participa-
tion of 90 to 100 Airport Security Coordinators (ASC) from all major airports around 
the  Nation.  TSNM-Airports  uses  this  process  to  regularly  inform  the  associations 
and  the  airport  community  of  pending  regulatory  changes  through  the  issuance  of 
security  directives  and  to  provide  updates  on  TSA  programs  being  implemented  at 
airports.  Additionally,  TSNM-Airports  coordinates  and  manages  meetings  between 
Airport  Directors  and  senior  TSA  leadership  on  issues  ranging  from  financial  reim-
bursements, technology requests, TSA staffing, and future terminal design and con-
struction work. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43

As  the  TSA  spokesperson  to  the  airport  community,  TSNM-Airports  participates 
in frequent industry-sponsored conferences, meetings and seminars to keep the com-
munity  apprised  of  operational  issues,  policy  guidance,  and  future  plans.  These  op-
portunities  are  an  excellent  forum  to  provide  a  large  audience  with  the  TSA’s  stra-
tegic  vision  and  to  meet  individually  with  specific  airport  representatives.  Some  of 
the  issues  brought  up  by  the  airports  include  leased  space  and  potential  pilot  pro-
grams. TSNM-Airports works with other offices within TSA on these issues and pro-
vides  timely  and  accurate  feedback  to  the  airports.  TSNM-Airports  meets  regularly 
with  the  Airport  Associations  Board  of  Directors  and  Senior  Security  Directors. 
These  meetings  allow  Directors  to  broach  specific,  technical  issues  and  to  brain-
storm ideas. They also provide a forum for them to address issues regarding current 
policies. 

On  several  occasions,  senior  Airport  Directors  and  association  managers  have 
been  invited  to  participate  in  classified  threat  briefings.  These  briefings  outline  the 
current  threat  situation  and  threat  streams  and  provide  a  discussion  of  TSA’s  plan 
to  counter  the  threat.  Attendees  must  possess  a  Secret  security  clearance,  which 
TSNM-Airports helps them acquire. 

TSNM-Airlines  works  daily  with  stakeholders  to  develop  and  maintain  close  and 
effective working relationships with air carrier security directors and the major air-
line  associations  including  the  Air  Transport  Association  (ATA),  which  is  the  pri-
mary  trade  and  service  organization  of  the  U.S.  airline  industry.  ATA  represents 
over  ninety  percent  of  U.S.  airline  passenger  and  cargo  traffic.  TSNM-Airlines  also 
has  extensive  knowledge  and  close  relationships  with  the  other  four  major  airline 
associations  in  Washington,  D.C.,  including  the  Air  Carrier  Association  of  America, 
which  represents  low-fare  carriers,  the  Regional  Airline  Association,  which  rep-
resents regional air carriers, the National Air Carrier Association of America, which 
primarily represents charter airlines, and, on occasion, the International Air Trans-
port Association, which represents international air carriers. In addition, they have 
developed  effective  working  relationships  with  the  Air  Line  Pilots  Association,  the 
Coalition  of  Airline  Pilots,  the  Association  of  Flight  Attendants,  and  several  other 
aviation  union  groups.  The  U.S.  Chamber  of  Commerce  and  the  National  Business 
Travelers  Association  are  business  related  stakeholder  associations  with  which 
TSNM  is  also  in  close  contact  to  gather  industry  input  and  share  information  with 
these groups on TSA issues and programs. 

TSNM-Airlines  consistently  partners  with  other  agencies  within  the  Department 
of Homeland Security (DHS), such as Customs and Border Protection (CBP), as well 
as  the  Department  of  Transportation  (DOT)  and  Federal  Aviation  Administration 
(FAA),  and  works  closely  with  the  White  House  Homeland  Security  Council  on 
projects  such  as  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  (HSPD)  16.  To  complete 
planning and implementation of HSPD–16, TSNM-Airlines has worked closely with 
DHS Offices of Policy and Infrastructure Protection, the United States Secret Serv-
ice,  as  well  as  the  Department  of  Commerce,  Department  of  Defense,  Department 
of Justice/Federal Bureau of Investigation, and the Department of State. 

Pursuant  to  HSPD–7  and  the  National  Infrastructure  Protection  Plan,  the  Avia-
tion  Government  Coordinating  Council  (GCC)  was  established  as  an  interagency 
body  to  include  Federal  and  State  officials  with  responsibilities  that  relate  to  the 
aviation  sector.  DHS  has  designated  TSNM-Airlines  as  the  Chair  of  the  Aviation 
GCC,  and  in  this  chair,  TSNM-Airlines  coordinates  with  other  departments  and 
agencies  for  the  aviation  transportation  sector.  The  Aviation  GCC  has  met  on  sev-
eral  occasions.  HSPD–7  called  for  the  establishment  of  the  Aviation  Sector  Coordi-
nating Council (SCC) to be led by the owners and operators of the aviation industry. 
It is self-organized and has elected its own chairman. The Aviation SCC is working 
to  institutionalize  the  private  sector’s  coordination  of  policy  development,  aviation 
sector-wide  strategy  and  planning,  and  program  promulgation  and  implementation. 
The Aviation SCC will also conduct sector-wide industry coordination. The Aviation 
SCC  has  also  met  on  its  own  and  also  met  with  the  Aviation  GCC  for  an  initial 
introductory meeting. 

The objective of the Aviation GCC is to work in cooperation with, and as the coun-
terpart to, the private industry Aviation SCC to coordinate aviation security strate-
gies  and  activities,  to  establish  policies,  guidelines,  and  standards,  and  to  develop 
program metrics and performance criteria for the aviation mode. The Aviation GCC 
fosters communication across government and between the government and private 
industry in support of enhancement of the Nation’s homeland security posture. 

TSNM–General Aviation (GA) serves as a ‘‘one stop shop’’ for all matters relating 
to GA security. Due to the breadth and diversity of GA operations, TSNM–GA works 
in  coordination  with  the  industry/GA  stakeholder  community  to  develop  and  imple-
ment  security  programs  and  policies  that  are  reasonable,  feasible,  and  effective. 
TSNM–GA, on a regular basis, maintains contact with the 17 GA trade associations 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44

that  represent  the  entire  spectrum  of  GA  activities,  including  the  Aircraft  Owners 
and  Pilots  Association,  General  Aviation  Manufacturers  Association,  National  Busi-
ness  Aviation  Association,  National  Air  Transportation  Association,  and  National 
Association  of  State  Aviation  Officials  via  routine  one-on-one  meetings  and  periodic 
GA  Coalition  meetings  with  DHS/TSA  leadership.  Additionally,  TSA  interacts  with 
the  GA  community  through  participation  at  trade  association  conferences,  industry 
events,  telephone  discussions/teleconferences,  electronic  dissemination  of  security 
advisories,  and  compliance  inspections.  TSNM–GA  also  continuously  coordinates 
with State, local, and other Federal agencies, such as CBP and FAA, on various se-
curity programmatic and policy issues. 

TSNM-International’s  outreach  to  the  transportation  industry  association  stake-
holders  is  both  global  and  regionally  oriented.  On  a  global  scale,  TSA  meets  regu-
larly with the International Air Transport Association (IATA) to discuss, most nota-
bly, harmonization of aviation security measures. Outreach to the aviation industry 
on  a  regional  level  has  been  established  through  the  Association  of  European  Air-
lines  (AEA)  in  Europe;  Association  of  Asia  Pacific  Airlines  (AAPA)  and  Association 
of  South  Pacific  Airlines  (ASPA)  in  Asia-Pacific;  Association  of  Latin  American  Air-
lines (ALTA) in the Caribbean and South America. In February 2007, TSNM-Inter-
national  held  its  first  security  conference  in  Miami,  Florida,  in  conjunction  with 
ALTA.  The  success  of  this  conference  has  prompted  AEA,  AAPA/ASPA  and  IATA 
to request conferences in their regions, which TSA is already planning.

Question 11. How and when do you plan to certify that Secure Flight has met the 

10 mandates Congress required? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) is defining and imple-
menting  a  strategy  for  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  certification 
through  close  collaboration  with  the  DHS  Screening  Coordination  Office  (SCO). 
Based  on  the  current  schedule,  DHS  certification  of  the  10  areas  of  Congressional 
direction  given  to  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  will  be  complete  in 
the  third  quarter  of  FY  2009,  following  operational  testing  with  the  first  groups  of 
aircraft operators. TSA is working closely with GAO to facilitate their review of the 
program’s development. Secure Flight is one of the Department’s top priorities, and 
TSA  is  continually  investigating  ways  to  accelerate  the  program  schedule  to  allow 
for  an  expedited  implementation  of  the  system,  as  appropriate  and  within  estab-
lished life-cycle cost estimates.

Question  12.  At  what  point  in  the  development  of  Secure  Flight  will  certification 

Answer.  The  certification  process  is  under  way.  Progress  is  being  made  in  each 
of  the  ten  areas  of  Congressional  direction,  with  three  of  the  items  already  com-
pleted.

Question 13. Will all mandated areas be addressed simultaneously or do you plan 

to move forward incrementally? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration plans to address each of the 
ten areas of Congressional direction within a time-frame compatible with the sched-
ule for critical program milestones. Progress is being made in each of the ten areas 
of Congressional direction, with three of the items already completed.

Question  14.  What  events  need  to  be  accomplished  before  you  can  certify  Secure 

begin? 

Flight? 

Answer.  Final  certification  of  the  ten  areas  of  Congressional  direction  for  Secure 

Flight will occur after parallel operations with aircraft operators are under way. 

The  table  below  identifies  completion  milestones  and  Secure  Flight’s  current  pro-

gram status for each of the ten areas of Congressional direction.

Number 

Condition 

Milestone for Completion 

Secure Flight Status 

1

2

3

System  of  due  process  (Re-

dress) 

During operational test-

ing 

Nearly complete

System  error  rate  will  not 
produce  a  large  number  of 
false positives 

TSA  has  stress  tested  the  ac-

curacy of the system 

During parallel oper-

ations 

In progress

End of system testing 

In progress

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Number 

Condition 

Milestone for Completion 

Secure Flight Status 

45

4

5

6

7

8

9

DHS  has  established  an  in-

ternal oversight board 

Initiation of Investment 

Review Board (IRB) 
Reviews 

Complete

TSA  has 

sufficient  oper-
ational  safeguards  to  re-
duce abuse opportunities 

Substantial  security  meas-
ures are in place to prevent 
hacking 

TSA has effective oversight of 
the  use  and  operation  of 
the system 

There  are  no  specific  privacy 
concerns  with  the  architec-
ture of the system 

Accommodate 

unique 
needs 

states  with 
transportation 

Authority to Operate 

granted 

In progress

Authority to Operate 

granted 

In progress

Authority to Operate 

granted 

In progress

Privacy documentation 

established 

In progress

TSA Office of Intel-

ligence (OI) assess-
ment of CAPPS 
changes impact 

Complete

10

Appropriate  life-cycle  cost  es-
timates and programs exist 

End of program plan-

ning 

Complete 

Question  15.  To  what  extent  is  the  TSA  cooperating  with  the  GAO’s  legislatively 
mandated  review  of  Secure  Flight,  to  include  providing  requested  documents  and 
interviews, and keeping them abreast of re-baselining/reassessment efforts? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  created  a  docu-
ment library for GAO to review Secure Flight program documentation. TSA is firmly 
committed  to  working  with  the  General  Accountability  Office  (GAO),  and  has  con-
ducted a number of meetings to provide program status as well as to discuss specific 
topics of interest to GAO. During 2006, TSA was working to re-baseline the Secure 
Flight program. Now that the re-baselining work has been completed, TSA is ready 
to participate with GAO in their review of the program.

Question 16. Have you provided the GAO requested information needed to conduct 

their review, if not, why not? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) is firmly committed to 
working  with  the  General  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  and  is  working  to  provide 
GAO with the information it requires to review the Secure Flight program through-
out its system development life cycle. TSA has created a document library for GAO 
to  review  Secure  Flight  program  documentation.  It  was  TSA’s  initial  intent  to  pro-
vide GAO with program documents which had been finalized so as to not encumber 
GAO.  TSA  has  decided  to  modify  this  approach  and  engage  GAO  prior  to  the  final-
ization  of  documentation.  TSA  will  continue  to  provide  GAO  with  the  information 
needed to support its efforts.

Question  17.  What  other  layers  of  security  are  in  place  to  prevent  known  or  sus-
pected terrorists from boarding domestic flights when they go undetected by airlines’ 
name-match screening processes? 

Answer.  Currently,  air  carriers  are  required  by  the  Aircraft  Operator  Standard 
Security Program (AOSSP) to conduct name matches to the Transportation Security 
Administration’s  (TSA)  No  Fly  and  Selectee  lists.  Along  with  the  name-matching, 
a  passenger  may  be  selected  for  additional  screening  based  on  certain  nonidentity 
factors  reflected  in  reservation  information.  Once  a  passenger  receives  a  boarding 
document  from  an  air  carrier,  however,  no  further  name-matching  security  meas-
ures  exist  to  identify  and  prevent  a  specific  traveler  from  boarding  an  aircraft.  All 
passengers  must  go  through  the  physical  screening  process  at  the  security  check-
point.  New  measures  such  as  the  Screening  Passengers  by  Observational  Tech-
niques  (SPOT)  have  also  been  implemented  to  identify  travelers  with  nefarious  in-
tent.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46

Question  18.  How  can  the  TSA  assure  the  Committee  that  all  airlines  are  con-
ducting  name-match  screening  against  the  terrorist  watch  list  with  the  same  level 
of scrutiny and care? 

Answer. Most airlines have incorporated an electronic software program to satisfy 
the requirements of the regulation to conduct name-based checks against Transpor-
tation Security Administration (TSA) watch lists. These systems are integrated into 
the air carrier’s reservation system so that the check is done as a part of completing 
the reservation. This helps to eliminate the possibility of human error. 

Compliance with this regulatory requirement is part of the inspections TSA Avia-
tion  Security  Inspectors  (ASIs)  conduct  in  the  field.  These  inspections  are  listed  as 
critical  in  the  TSA  Annual  Inspection  Plan,  which  calls  for  a  frequent  review  of 
these measures to ensure continued compliance. 

TSA  headquarters-based  Principal  Security  Inspectors  (PSIs),  who  are  the  point 
of  contact  for  the  air  carriers’  corporate  security  offices,  annually  review  the  proce-
dures used by the air carriers to conduct these checks. One way to verify the process 
is  to  have  the  air  carrier  create  a  reservation  with  the  name  of  an  individual  on 
a current watch list to ensure that the process works. 

TSA conducted Special Emphasis Assessments on compliance with the No Fly List 
in  June/July  2005  and  September  2005.  Both  sets  of  tests  revealed  a  94  percent 
compliance rate. 

There  is  no  incentive  for  an  air  carrier  not  to  comply  with  this  process.  It  is  al-
ready  imbedded  into  their  reservation  system.  If  the  automated  systems  are  down 
and  a  carrier  must  process  a  passenger  manually,  the  expense  of  having  to  divert 
an  aircraft  mid-flight  because  the  carrier  fails  to  run  a  passenger  against  the  list 
is a significant deterrent to non-compliance.

Question  19.  Over  the  past  year,  what  progress  has  the  TSA  made  in  conducting 
assessments  of  the  threats  and  vulnerabilities  facing  critical  transportation  assets? 
Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) has been working con-
tinuously to update and expand its assessments of threats and vulnerabilities in the 
transportation sector. TSA has been making use of these assessments in conjunction 
with  our  security  partners 
industry  to  mitigate,  by 
‘‘operationalizing’’ intelligence and addressing vulnerabilities. 
Headquarters Analysis 

in  government  and 

TSA’s layered approach to security seeks to identify and deter threats well before 
they  reach  the  Nation’s  airports,  railways,  highways,  mass  transit,  ports  and  pipe-
lines. Transportation-specific intelligence is critical to TSA’s overall risk-based secu-
rity  strategy,  and  its  products  provide  a  threat  framework  to  prioritize  security  re-
sources  and  operationalize  intelligence.  TSA  has  two  operational  programs  with 
field  units,  the  Office  of  Security  Operations,  which  is  responsible  for  both  aviation 
Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSO)  screening  and  surface  inspector  operations, 
and  the  Office  of  Law  Enforcement,  which  is  responsible  for  the  Federal  Air  Mar-
shal  Service  (FAM).  These  elements  incorporate  intelligence  into  their  operations 
and plans on a daily basis, acting or deploying on the basis of the latest information. 
TSA  also  coordinates  closely  and  shares  information  with  other  Department  of 
Homeland  Security  (DHS)  components,  the  intelligence  and  law  enforcement  com-
munities,  other  government  departments  and  agencies  such  as  the  Department  of 
Transportation  (DOT),  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA),  and  the  trans-
portation industry. These security partners both provide intelligence and, especially 
in  industry,  are  often  well-positioned  to  operationalize  transportation-specific  intel-
ligence by adjusting their business or security operations. 

TSA’s Office of Intelligence has produced classified and unclassified annual threat 
assessments  for  each  transportation  mode  and  the  cargo/supply  chain  sector  since 
2004.  These  reports  are  disseminated  throughout  TSA,  DHS,  and  private  industry. 
Other Office of Intelligence products include:

• Transportation Intelligence Gazette 
• Special Threat Assessments 
• Weekly Field Intelligence Report 
• Suspicious Incidents Report 
• Intelligence Notes 
• Transportation Situational Awareness Notes
TSA  is  also  conducting  specific  analyses  related  to  General  Aviation  and  under-
water  mass  transit  tunnels.  The  General  Aviation  (GA)  Risk  Assessment/Throw 
Weight  Study  will  analyze  the  damage  potential  and  risk  associated  with  GA  air-
craft,  as  well  as  the  threat  environment  within  the  National  Airspace  System.  An 
Underwater  Tunnel  Working  Group  was  established  in  October  2006  consisting  of 
members from various DHS and Department of Transportation (DOT) entities. This 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47

interagency  team  has  taken  significant  steps  to  identify  vulnerabilities  of  under-
water  tunnels  and  has  put  into  place  aggressive  mitigation  strategies  to  protect 
high-risk  and  high-consequence  tunnel  infrastructure  in  both  the  short  and  long 
term. 
Field Assessments 

At  the  field  level,  TSA  conducts  various  assessments  which  are  either  explicitly 
vulnerability  assessments,  or  at  least  provide  vulnerability-related  information.  In 
all  cases  they  further  TSA’s  risk-based  security  strategy  and  are  described  below. 
Corporate Security Reviews 

A Corporate Security Review (CSR) is an assessment tool that evaluates corporate 
level  security  policies,  practices,  and  procedures.  Specific  CSR  evaluation  criteria 
have  been  established  for  the  pipeline,  rail,  and  highway  modes.  The  CSR  criteria 
identify  a  desired  baseline  of  security  for  a  company;  and  the  accumulation  of  indi-
vidual assessments establish an actual baseline in a given industry or mode, as well 
as potentially identifying best practices and common concerns. 

In  the  highway  mode,  TSA  entered  into  agreements  with  37  state  departments 
of  transportation  or  bridge  administrations  to  conduct  CSRs  of  their  facilities  and 
critical  infrastructure.  In  addition,  TSA  conducts  CSRs  of  motor  coach,  school  bus, 
and trucking companies. By the end of FY 2006, a total of 71 CSRs were conducted 
in the highway mode. Additionally, 950 CSRs were conducted by the Missouri Com-
mercial  Motor  Vehicle  Inspectors  under  a  pilot  project  that  TSA  is  currently  evalu-
ating. 

In  the  pipeline  mode,  a  total  of  54  CSRs  have  been  conducted,  including  seven 
reviews in FY 2006 with companies that represent approximately 60 percent of the 
product  transported  through  the  Nation’s  pipelines.  In  addition,  TSA  has  joined 
with  Natural  Resources  Canada  to  conduct  four  security  assessments  for  critical 
cross-border energy pipeline systems. 

In  the  rail  mode,  TSA  has  developed  a  CSR  program  and  will  be  conducting  as-

sessments in Spring 2007. 
TIH Rail Assessments 

TSA  conducts  vulnerability  assessments  of  High  Threat  Urban  Area  (HTUA)  rail 
corridors  where  toxic  inhalation  hazard  (TIH)  shipments  are  transported.  Over  the 
last year, detailed region-wide rail corridor assessments were completed in Houston, 
Buffalo,  and  northern  New  Jersey,  and  a  fourth  assessment  is  in  the  early  stages 
of  completion  for  the  Los  Angeles  area.  The  HTUA  corridor  assessments  provide 
site-specific  mitigation  strategies  and  lessons  learned  as  well  as  tactics  that  can  be 
modified for use at the corporate or national level. HTUA corridor assessments sup-
ported  the  development  of  the  Recommended  Security  Action  Items  (SAI)  issued  by 
DHS  and  DOT  on  June  23,  2006.  These  performance-based  SAIs  were  developed  to 
foster  an  enhanced  security  posture  in  the  freight  rail  mode  in  general  and  specifi-
cally  targeted  the  transport  of  TIH  materials.  These  practices  have  been  agreed  to 
in  binding  commitments  by  the  Nation’s  railways,  and  form  the  basis  for  pending 
regulation. 
Joint Vulnerability Assessments (JVA) 

During  FY  2006,  the  Office  of  Security  Assessments  completed  15  Joint  Vulner-
ability Assessments (JVAs). The JVA is a physical security survey conducted jointly 
with the Federal Bureau of Investigation that goes above and beyond regulatory re-
quirements  and  covers  all  aspects  of  the  airport  operation  that  includes,  but  is  not 
limited to:

• Critical Infrastructure (power, water, HVAC, communications) 
• Fuel 
• Cargo 
• Catering 
• Terminal (Public & Sterile) 
• Perimeter 
• Access control 
• Ramp 
• Baggage 
• Fixed Base Operators (FBO)

Man-Portable Air Defense System (MANPADS) Vulnerability Assessments (MVA) 

During FY 2006, MVAs were conducted at 84 domestic airports. TSA plans to con-
duct MVAs at all Category X and Category I airports annually, as per guidance out-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48

lined  in  the  National  Security  Presidential  Security  47/Homeland  Security  Presi-
dential Directive 16 (NSPD–47/HSPD–16). 
Air Cargo Vulnerability Assessments 

In  September  2006,  TSA  began  developing  a  methodology  and  tool  to  analyze 
vulnerabilities  associated  with  U.S.  commercial  air  cargo  supply  chain  operations. 
In  December  2006,  TSA  began  a  pilot  program  to  test  the  vulnerability  assessment 
methodology,  tool,  and  protocols  in  supply  chains  at  three  U.S.  airports.  The  pilot 
program  engages  volunteer  companies  representing  different  nodes  of  the  air  cargo 
supply chain. During the pilot, vulnerability assessment information is confidential, 
and  no  enforcement  actions  occur  as  a  result  of  the  pilot.  When  the  pilot  is  com-
pleted  in  March  2007,  TSA  will  assess  the  feasibility  of  requiring  vulnerability  as-
sessments in addition to its regulatory inspection requirements. 
Surface Transportation Security Inspectors (STSI) 
BASE Reviews 

Within  the  last  year,  the  STSI  program  has  conducted  26  Baseline  Assessments 
for Security Enhancement (BASE reviews) as part of a program to conduct security 
reviews on the 50 largest transit systems nationwide. The BASE process reviews se-
curity  procedures  put  in  place  by  a  transit  (rail  and  bus)  system  to  assist  in  evalu-
ating  the  performance  of  its  security  system.  BASE  is  not  a  compliance  inspection, 
but  rather  a  collaborative  effort  between  the  stakeholder  and  TSA.  No  enforcement 
actions  occur  as  a  result  of  BASE.  To  conduct  this  joint  review,  STSIs  meet  with 
security representatives of the transit agency to review the agency’s pertinent docu-
ments. 
Security Action Items (SAI)—Non-regulatory inspections 

To gain an understanding of the degree of implementation across the Nation, rail-
road  carriers  of  TIH  materials,  DHS  and  DOT  agreed  to  conduct  SAI  Implementa-
tion  Surveys  (SAIIS)  of  freight  rail  operations.  These  surveys  are  conducted  by 
STSIs. The surveys are not compliance inspections, but rather assessments to deter-
mine the depth and degree of employee security awareness and security action item 
implementation. The results of the SAI Surveys will be reviewed and the data used 
to  guide  future  policy  decisions  regarding  the  security  of  hazardous  material  rail 
shipments.  Since  October  2006,  STSIs  conducted  165  field  site  visits  of  freight  rail-
road yards and facilities and interviewed 2,600 front-line railroad workers. 
Security Analysis and Action Programs (SAAP)—Risk Assessments 

STSIs  conduct  Security  Analysis  and  recommend  an  Action  Program.  SAAPs  are 
full  risk  assessments  of  transit  and  rail  systems.  They  are  not  compliance  inspec-
tions.  An  SAAP  assessment  rigorously  analyzes  the  likelihood  and  consequence  of 
the threat stream matrix for the rail environment and analyzes the effectiveness of 
countermeasures to manage risk effectively. SAAPs leverage the DHS Vulnerability 
Identification Self Assessment Tool (VISAT). 

The STSI program has completed full SAAP assessments on the following rail sys-

tems:

• Virginia Railway Express 
• Alaska Railroad 
• Tri-Met (Portland, Oregon)

Regulatory Compliance Inspections 

In  addition  to  these  assessments,  regulatory  compliance  inspections  are  also  con-
ducted  by  TSA  officials.  These  compliance  inspections  are  similar  to  vulnerability 
assessments  but  evaluate  the  security  of  a  system  against  regulatory  standards  as 
opposed  to  threat  scenarios.  In  FY  2006,  TSA  conducted  94,145  compliance  inspec-
tions  of  airports,  aircraft  operators,  indirect  air  carriers,  and  other  regulated  enti-
ties. For FY 2007 TSA has developed and implemented a risk-based national inspec-
tion plan. As part of the risk-based methodology for inspections, TSA Aviation Secu-
rity  Inspectors  conduct  critical  inspections  and  testing  focused  on  the  nature  and 
credibility of the security threat, the vulnerabilities associated with the threat, and 
the magnitude of potential consequences. The critical inspections are focused on air-
port operators, aircraft operators, and cargo. To date in FY 2007, TSA has conducted 
27,557  inspections,  including  6,038  critical  inspections  focused  on  airports,  aircraft 
operators,  and  cargo.  Testing  is  also  conducted  to  ensure  compliance  with  access 
control,  perimeter  security,  passenger  checkpoint  identification  verification,  and  air 
cargo security requirements.

Question  20.  How  will  this  information  be  used  to  select  and  prioritize  invest-

ments, as well as to assess the effectiveness of these investments? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49

Answer.  The  results  of  these  assessments  are  an  important  part  of  the  Depart-
ment  of  Homeland  Security’s  (DHS)  approach  to  risk  management  and  help  drive 
the  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA)  resource  priorities,  decisions 
and programs. 

For example, DHS’ Transit Security Grant Program will use the assessment data 
to  encourage  and  evaluate  project  proposals  from  the  applicants  that  address  the 
most  important  risks  to  the  transportation  sector.  Follow-up  visits  to  the  grant 
awardees  will  reveal  the  degree  to  which  identified  security  gaps  have  been  closed. 
These  follow-up  visits  will  help  determine  the  effectiveness  of  the  grant  awards, 
allow  TSA  to  update  its  headquarters  analyses,  such  as  the  Top  100  List,  and  help 
better understand how its has affected overall risk levels within the sector. 

TSA continually takes this assessment data into account especially during its an-
nual  budgeting  process.  Program  managers  set  annual  and  out-year  program  prior-
ities based on the outputs from the various assessments, and these are re-evaluated 
regularly  based  on  the  latest  threat  and  assessment  information.  Further,  the  Risk 
Management  Analysis  Tool  (RMAT)  will  be  used  in  the  future  to  specifically  quan-
tify  the  cost  effectiveness  of  security  investments  in  the  U.S.  commercial  aviation 
system. 

The  assessment  data  is  also  used  for  development  of  new  security  strategies,  es-
tablishment  of  new  Security  Action  Items,  and  deployment  of  operational  TSA  re-
sources. For example, TSA’s Large Aircraft Standard Security Program (LASSP) will 
leverage information from the General Aviation (GA) risk assessment, as well as re-
view  existing  standard  security  programs,  to  modify  its  security  strategies  and  im-
plement  an  all  encompassing  security  program  for  aircraft,  regardless  of  the  type 
of  operation,  in  excess  of  a  scientifically-validated  threshold  weight.  This  program 
will  leverage  elements  from  existing  security  programs,  while  including  additional 
security enhancements. 
Security Action Items 

Toxic Inhalation Hazard (TIH) Rail assessments supported the development of the 
Recommended  Security  Action  Items  (SAI)  issued  by  DHS  and  the  Department  of 
Transportation (DOT) on June 23, 2006. These performance-based SAIs were devel-
oped to foster an enhanced security posture in the freight rail mode in general, and 
in transporting TIH materials in particular. 
Operational Deployments 

TSA  uses  real-time  threat  information  to  guide  its  deployment  of  resources,  in-
cluding  the  National  Deployment  Office,  canine  teams,  and  Visible  Intermodal  Pro-
tection and Response (VIPR) Teams. In response to indicators and warnings of high 
threat  to  transportation,  TSA  will  surge  these  resources,  as  appropriate,  to  reduce 
the risk of attack.

Question  21.  In  developing  plans  for  future  years’  budgets  and  funding,  what 
mechanisms will the TSA use to identify areas where existing reserves—particularly 
from  programs  that  are  not  performing—can  be  reallocated  to  support  new  and 
emerging priorities? 

Answer.  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  leadership  frequently  re-
views  and  re-evaluates  the  allocations  of  funding  provided  to  TSA  programs, 
projects,  and  activities.  Additionally,  reviews  are  conducted  as  part  of  the  budget 
process,  and  as  part  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  mid-year  re-
view.  Programs  are  compared  against  their  expenditure  plans  and  if  excess  funds 
are identified, they are either offered up as base reallocations in the annual budget 
or  reallocated  within  the  budget  year  through  the  reprogramming  provisions  estab-
lished  by  the  committees,  or  both.  In  addition,  programs  are  routinely  subject  to 
scrutiny  through  such  mechanisms  as  DHS  and  component  investment  review 
boards and the Program Assessment Rating Tool (PART) conducted under the Presi-
dent’s Management Agenda.

Question  22.  Canada  has  recently  instituted  what  it  calls  the  Restricted  Area 
Identity Card, or RAIC, to enhance security at all 29 of the principal air carrier air-
ports in Canada. At the primary access doors to restricted areas of major Canadian 
airports,  120,000  cardholders  will  have  either  their  fingerprint  or  iris  scanned  by 
a biometric reader. What is preventing the agency from making the kind of progress 
that  Canada  has  made  in  this  regard?  Does  TSA  intend  to  make  TWIC  a  part  of 
the aviation security environment, and if so, when? 

Answer. The Transportation Worker Identification Credential (TWIC) has focused 
its  initial  implementation  efforts  on  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  (MTSA) 
regulated facilities and vessels. TWIC will provide a common, tamper resistant cre-
dential,  issued  after  the  successful  completion  of  a  security  threat  assessment  that 
can  be  tied  to  an  individual  by  a  reference  biometric.  This  type  of  common  secure 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50

credential  does  not  currently  exist  in  the  maritime  environment  whereas  airports 
and  airlines  have  already  done  a  great  deal  of  work  in  this  area.  DHS  is  presently 
reviewing all of its credentialing programs to determine not only where redundancy 
exists but also where existing resources may be more efficiently leveraged.

Question 23. At least one major air carrier has taken steps to add secondary bar-
riers  to  their  aircraft,  to  supplement  the  reinforced  flight  deck  door.  Security  advo-
cates  claim  that  these  barriers  are  needed  to  prevent  against  a  terrorist  or  other 
type  of  criminal  from  pushing  their  way  into  the  cockpit  when  the  flight  deck  door 
is  opened.  Has  TSA  taken  a  position  on  installation  of  secondary  barriers?  Would 
TSA support legislation requiring their installation? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA),  along  with  the  Fed-
eral  Aviation  Administration  (FAA),  created  an  acceptable  standard  for  reinforced 
flight  deck  doors  in  2003.  Current  aircraft  design  still  requires  the  flight  deck  door 
to open during flight for pilot ingress and egress. While TSA acknowledges opening 
the flight deck door while in flight is a vulnerability, each air carrier has measures 
in place to mitigate the vulnerability. 

The FAA-approved secondary barrier can only be used on certain types of aircraft. 
Not  all  commercial  aircraft  can  accommodate  this  barrier  without  extensive  recon-
figuration.  TSA  believes  the  secondary  barriers  are  useful,  but  more  options  need 
to be provided before TSA can take any position on future legislation.

Question  24.  Regarding  air  cargo,  Security  Identification  Display  Areas  (SIDA) 
procedures, which would protect against such unauthorized access, are not required 
at all airports served by all-cargo aircraft. Does TSA believe that security would be 
enhanced  by  including  all-cargo  aircraft  within  the  SIDA?  If  so,  has  the  agency  de-
termined when it will act to address this deficiency? Does the agency plan to require 
fortified flight deck doors on all freighter aircraft? Does TSA anticipate applying the 
new Air Cargo Risk-Based Targeting (ACROBAT) Program to all-cargo aircraft oper-
ations? 

Answer.  The  Air  Cargo  Security  Requirements  Final  Rule  (71  FR  30478)  pub-
lished on May 26, 2006, requires airports that currently maintain a Security Identi-
fication  Display  Area  (SIDA)  to  expand  the  SIDA  to  air  cargo  operating  areas.  At 
airports  where  SIDA  is  non-existent  but  all-cargo  operations  occur,  the  Transpor-
tation Security Administration (TSA) requires aircraft operators to incorporate other 
security  measures  into  their  programs.  For  instance,  TSA  requires  Security  Threat 
Assessments  (STA)  for  all  persons  who  have  unescorted  access  to  cargo.  Section 
1544.228  of  the  Final  Rule  requires  that  all-cargo  aircraft  operators  comply  by 
March 15, 2007, for direct employees and by June 15, 2007, for agents. These indus-
try  deadlines  were  recently  extended  via  notice  in  the  Federal  Register  to  May  15, 
2007, for direct employees, and July 15, 2007, for agents. 

TSA continues to support a layered security approach to detect, deter, and prevent 
a criminal or terrorist act against an all-cargo aircraft operator. Since 9/11, all-cargo 
aircraft  operators  have  restricted  persons  accompanying  flights  as  passengers.  In 
addition,  many  all-cargo  aircraft  operators  have  installed  fortified  flight  deck  doors 
as a security best practice. 

Additionally,  TSA  has  implemented  a  Federal  Flight  Deck  Officer  (FFDO)  pro-
gram  for  all-cargo  aircraft  operators.  The  program  provides  training  to  pilots,  pro-
gram management, resources, and equipment to protect the aircraft. 

TSA  is  currently  concentrating  its  efforts  on  developing  an  air  cargo  risk-based 
targeting  system  to  assess  the  risk  of  cargo  destined  for  movement  on  all  aircraft 
operating within the United States. TSA is conducting a pre-operational test of this 
system  and  have  included  an  all-cargo  aircraft  operator  as  a  host  location  for  this 
test. TSA plans to use this system to assess risk of cargo destined for all-cargo air-
craft as the system matures.

Question  25.  The  TSA  indicated  it  is  developing  a  plan  to  deploy  emerging  tech-
nologies for improving security screening for air passengers and their carry-on bags. 
How  does  this  technology  differ  from  technology  used  today?  Also,  will  the  TSA 
focus  on  a  ‘‘total  system’’  approach  which  improves  detection,  increases  passenger 
throughput  and  reduces  overall  cost  or  will  it  continue  its  focus  on  individually  de-
veloped breakthrough technology? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) continues to move for-
ward  and  is  preparing  to  operationally  test  and  evaluate  additional  emerging  tech-
nologies in FY 2007 to include advanced x-ray technology systems, automated explo-
sives  detection  systems,  and  bottled  liquid  scanners  for  carry-on  items,  as  well  as 
whole  body  imagers,  second-generation  explosives  detection  trace  portals,  and  cast 
and prosthesis scanners for persons. While these new technologies do offer increased 
automation for the detection of explosives and increased passenger throughput, they 
represent individual efforts that have been under development for several years and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51

will  not  likely  reduce  overall  costs.  However,  it  is  essential  that  TSA  continue  to 
drive  R&D  requirements  that  will  support  moving  to  a  total  system  approach  that 
will  not  only  increase  capabilities  and  minimize  processing  times,  but  also  reduce 
overall operation and maintenance costs for the screening system. 

TSA  has  an  ongoing  effort  to  map  the  path  forward  for  the  checkpoint  of  the  fu-
ture,  which  looks  at  five  (5)  years  and  beyond.  In  the  meantime,  TSA  has  aggres-
sively  addressed  key  existing  vulnerabilities.  TSA  uses  a  layered  approach  to  secu-
rity  at  checkpoints,  and  technology  is  just  one  component  in  the  strategy.  TSA  has 
modified  existing  technologies  and  developed  procedures  at  the  checkpoint  to  suc-
cessfully detect explosives. Key to the successful detection of explosives is the Trans-
portation Security Officer (TSO). TSOs have received training in explosive detection 
and  have  demonstrated  proficiency.  On  the  personnel  front,  TSA  has  invested  re-
sources in developing, implementing and training TSOs in order to augment the cur-
rent  technology  available.  On  the  technology  side,  we  have  made  modifications  to 
the  technology.  Therefore,  existing  technology  solutions  are  being  used  more  effec-
tively  and  efficiently  to  meet  TSA  security  goals  through  better  trained  TSOs  and 
equipment modifications. The prohibited items list was modified to reduce the num-
ber  of  items  TSOs  are  looking  for  to  allow  them  to  concentrate  technology  more  on 
explosives. TSOs are also trained in behavioral recognition and bomb appraisal. Ca-
nines  provide  a  visible,  unpredictable  deterrence  in  and  around  the  checkpoint  and 
also have detection capability. All things considered, TSA has successfully deployed 
checkpoint technologies to address vulnerabilities in a layered security system.

Question 26. Given the U.K. plot last summer, technology that screens passengers 
for  concealed  or  hidden  threats  has  become  an  intriguing  form  of  aviation  security. 
Health and privacy concerns have surfaced with some of these technologies although 
several foreign airports are now deploying a safe non-radiating version of this tech-
nology  for  improved  security  which  finally  moves  detection  beyond  the  traditional 
metal  gate  approach.  Has  the  U.S.  deployed  this  technology  yet?  What  are  your 
views on people screening at the checkpoint? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  supports  the  use  of 
whole  body  imaging  technology  and  has  recently  announced  the  pilot  testing  of  x-
ray backscatter technology, a whole body imager (WBI), which has been determined 
to  be  a  safe  technology  solution.  It  will  allow  our  screening  workforce  to  identify 
both metallic and non-metallic devices and objects on persons. Over the past several 
years,  TSA  has  worked  with  the  vendor  of  the  system  that  will  be  used  during  the 
pilot  to  develop  privacy  algorithms  that  produce  images  that  address  privacy  con-
cerns  while  still  providing  necessary  information  to  meet  security  needs.  The  first 
unit has been installed at Phoenix Sky Harbor International Airport with passenger 
screening  operations  beginning  in  February  2007.  The  initial  use  of  this  technology 
during this pilot will be for those passengers who volunteer to undergo scanning by 
the WBI in lieu of a manual pat-down inspection. 

Additionally,  TSA  is  pursuing  other  WBI  solutions,  to  include  millimeter  wave 
systems,  which  offer  a  non-radiating  technology.  Working  with  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security,  Science  and  Technology  Directorate,  TSA  is  evaluating  a  milli-
meter  wave  system  at  the  Transportation  Security  Lab  in  Atlantic  City.  Once  the 
system’s  capabilities  are  evaluated,  TSA  will  determine  whether  this  is  a  solution 
that  it  could  pilot  in  an  airport  environment  and  later  consider  for  inclusion  in  de-
ployment efforts.

Question  27.  The  spiral  development  approach  for  the  deployment  of  advanced 
technologies  has  been  very  successful  for  our  nations  military.  The  TSA’s  approach 
has  been  to  fund  new  and  inventive  technologies  to  achieve  breakthrough  improve-
ments.  This  has  resulted  in  the  very  slow  deployment  of  technology  while  we  wait 
for  the  better,  and  more  expensive  systems.  For  example,  technology  may  exist 
which  could  enhance  the  screening  of  liquids  at  the  checkpoint  utilizing  existing, 
cost  effective,  x-ray  equipment,  yet  this  has  not  been  deployed.  Can  you  provide 
your views on the TSA’s approach to technology development? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  taken  advantage 
of  every  opportunity  presented  to  operationally  test  and  evaluate  any  and  all  tech-
nologies that meet our requirements for detection, as well as operational suitability. 
TSA  does  support  spiral  development  of  technologies  and  has  so  demonstrated  by 
the  pilot  testing  that  continues  to  occur  for  new  solutions.  TSA  must  also  ensure 
that  it  invests  appropriated  dollars  wisely.  We  must  determine  to  what  extent  par-
tial  solutions  should  be  supported  with  the  funding  allocated  when  a  possible 
longer-term,  more  complete  solution  will  be  ready  for  operational  test  and  evalua-
tion within months of a possible partial solution investment. 

TSA  demonstrated  its  support  of  spiral  development  when  it  purchased  and  de-
ployed the explosives detection portals. Recognizing that this was a first-generation 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52

system,  TSA  deployed  sufficient  numbers  of  units  to  determine  durability  and  per-
formance  in  an  airport  environment  while  the  vendors  continued  to  work  on  im-
provements. 

Additionally,  TSA  has  been  conducting  evaluations  of  currently  available  ad-
vanced  x-ray  technology,  and  is  planning  to  invest  in  some  of  these  systems  as  an 
option  for  screening  carry-on  items.  This  investment  will  provide  some  enhance-
ments  that  will  assist  our  screening  workforce  to  better  identify  prohibited  items 
within  a  bag/item  and  provide  some  automated  detection  capabilities.  While  the 
automated  explosives  detection  system  that  will  be  piloted  in  FY  2007  will  offer  a 
more  complete  solution,  the  advanced  x-ray  technology  may  provide  an  option  for 
use at some airports and for some elements of the traveling public. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

HON. EDMUND S. ‘‘KIP’’ HAWLEY 

Question  1.  How  does  having  a  45,000  TSA  screener  cap  in  place  help  your  secu-

rity mission? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) uses people, training, 
equipment,  and  technology-based  strategies  to  efficiently  manage  each  checkpoint. 
The  newly  improved  Screening  Allocation  Model  objectively  measures  and  adjusts 
staffing  levels,  scheduling,  configurations,  and  the  use  of  differing  technologies  at 
each  airport.  This  allows  TSA  to  operate  efficiently  within  the  45,000  Transpor-
tation Security Officer cap while maintaining high security levels.

Question  2.  Can  TSA  keep  average  passenger  wait  times  to  below  10  minutes  at 
all  major  U.S.  airports  with  the  current  screener  workforce?  If  not,  how  many 
screeners  are  needed  to  provide  adequate  levels  of  security  and  keep  average  pas-
senger wait times below 10 minutes? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  (TSA)  Staffing  Allocation 
Model  incorporates  a  10-minute  wait  for  passenger  and  baggage  screening  at  the 
Nation’s  airports.  The  current  Congressional  allocation  allows  TSA  to  adequately 
maintain a 10-minute standard on 93 percent of calendar days. The remaining days 
need  to  be  supplemented  with  overtime  personnel.  When  10-minute  wait  times  are 
exceeded,  it  is  primarily  due  to  excessive  volume  demand  and  input  configurations 
not meeting volume demands.

Question  3.  How  many  full-time  and  part-time  TSO’s  are  currently  employed  at 
Newark  Liberty  Airport?  Of  these,  how  many  are  limited-duty  or  on  leave  for  med-
ical disability reasons? How many are on military leave? 

Answer.  The  report  below  identifies  the  number  of  full-time  (FT)  and  part-time 
(PT)  Transportation  Security  Officers  (TSOs)  at  Newark  Liberty  Airport  (EWR)  as 
of January 20, 2007.

Airport ID—EWR 

Job Series 

Job Title 

1802

Total 

Expert Transportation Security Officer 
Lead Transportation Security Officer (LTSO) 
Master TSO–BDO 
Supervisory  Transportation  Security  Officer 

(STSO) 

Transportation Security Officer 

FT 

PT 

Grand 
Total 

3
182
3
120

623

406

931

406

3
182
3
120

1029

1337

Data Source: Transportation Security Administration, Office of Human Capital. 
Data Date: January 20, 2007. 
Question  3a.  Of  these,  how  many  are  limited-duty  or  on  leave  for  medical  dis-

ability reasons? 

Answer. The report below identifies the number of TSOs on limited-duty and the 
number  of  TSOs  with  approved  and/or  pending  workers’  compensation  (WC)  claims 
who are on leave.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Title 

STSO 
LTSO 
TSO 

Totals 

53

# on Limited Duty 

Full Time 

Part Time 

# on Leave with Approved 

or Pending WC Claims 

Full Time 

Part Time 

1
4
19

24

0
0
5

5

*3
7
**46

56

0
0
5

5

* One (1) removal action is pending. 
*** Five (5) removal actions are pending. 
Question 3b. How many are on military leave? 
Answer. There are two (2) employees on military leave.
Question  4.  Is  former  Federal  Security  Director  Marcus  Arroyo  still  employed  by 
TSA or receiving any TSA funds on a contract basis? If so, please describe the rela-
tionship, and if not, when was his date of departure? 

Answer.  Mr.  Arroyo  is  no  longer  employed  with  the  Transportation  Security  Ad-
ministration  (TSA).  He  retired  on  January  3,  2007.  He  is  not  receiving  any  TSA 
funds on a contract basis.

Question  5.  Over  2  years  ago,  in  the  Intelligence  Reform  Act  of  2004,  Congress 
authorized  TSA  to  put  cameras  in  the  checked  baggage  screening  areas  of  airports, 
in  order  to  improve  security,  deter  thefts  and  mishandling  of  checked  baggage,  and 
help reduce claims against TSA for theft and mishandled baggage. How many have 
you installed, and what has been the effect? 

Answer. The Transportation Security Administration (TSA) established the Closed 
Circuit  TV  for  Airport  Program  (CCTVAP)  to  connect  and  supplement  existing  air-
port authority owned and operated video systems. Under the CCTVAP, TSA has en-
tered  into  Other  Transaction  Agreements  (OTAs)  with  20  airport  authorities  (3 
pending)  to  upgrade  CCTV  systems  and  recordation  at  checkpoints  and  baggage 
areas. 

The objective of the CCTVAP is to provide coverage of TSA areas and recordation 
of  events  plus  access  to  airport  authority  cameras  throughout  the  airport.  The  air-
port authority is the vendor and, working with the local TSA personnel, determines 
numbers  and  types  of  cameras  and  locations.  TSA  does  not  track  the  total  number 
of  CCTV  cameras  as  the  information  is  continuously  subject  to  change  to  meet  the 
need. However, TSA has entered into agreements with the following airports to sup-
port CCTV coverage at TSA screening locations for these airports:

Albuquerque International Sunport (ABQ) 
Burlington International Airport (BTV) 
Chicago O’Hare International Airport (ORD) 
Colorado Springs Municipal Airport (COS) 
Cyril E. King International Airport, Virgin Island (STT) 
Greater Buffalo Airport (BUF) 
Hartsfield Atlanta International Airport (ATL) 
Henry E. Rohlsen Airport, Virgin Island (STX) 
Honolulu International Airport (HNL) 
Los Angeles International Airport (LAX) 
Louisville International Airport (SDF) 
McCarran International Airport (LAS) 
Memphis International Airport (MEM) 
Miami International Airport (MIA) 
Minneapolis St. Paul International Airport (MSP) 
Portland International Airport (PDX) 
San Antonio International Airport (SAT) 
Seattle Tacoma International Airport (SEA) 
Southwest Florida International Airport (RSW)

Question  6.  Will  the  Administration  request  sufficient  funding  for  more  airports 
to  get  in-line  baggage  screening  systems,  specifically  through  the  ‘‘letter-of-intent’’ 
process? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  and  the  Department 
of Homeland Security remain committed to working with Congress to develop equi-
table,  feasible,  and  innovative  means  to  defraying  the  costs  of  more  expeditiously 
installing optimal in-line checked baggage screening equipment and systems. 

Progress on deploying in-line systems has been at a steady pace. Some of the larg-
est  airports  in  the  country  including  Boston,  Atlanta,  Dallas,  and  Denver  have  in-
line  systems  and  several  others  are  under  construction.  Today,  36  airports  have 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54

operational  in-line  systems—18  full  airport  systems  and  18  airports  with  partial 
systems (terminal solutions). Over the next two (2) years TSA expects full and par-
tial in-line systems to become operational at 25 additional airports. This level of ef-
fort best balances resources with all the other risks to transportation security. 

In February 2006, TSA provided Congress with a copy of a Strategic Plan for the 
Electronic  Baggage  Screening  Program.  The  Plan  identifies  the  optimal  checked 
baggage  screening  solution  for  the  Nation’s  top  250  airports,  which  process  99  per-
cent  of  all  checked  baggage  transported.  These  optimal  solutions  include  a  variety 
of in-line system configurations designed to support the needs of each individual air-
port.  The  plan  also  identifies  a  projected  time-line  when  the  implementation  of  the 
optimal  solution  would  be  most  appropriate.  Working  with  the  funding  levels  pro-
vided  each  fiscal  year  and  the  prioritization  model,  TSA  identifies  the  projects  to 
be executed.

Question 7. The 9/11 Commission Report recommends that ‘‘The TSA and the Con-
gress  must  give  priority  attention  to  improving  the  ability  of  screening  checkpoints 
to detect explosives on passengers’’ (page 393 of the report). Trace detection puffers 
are the only functioning devices available today (and for the foreseeable future) that 
are suitable for screening passengers for explosives. Why isn’t TSA continuing to de-
ploy explosive trace detection ‘‘puffer’’ machines? And why did TSA suspend deploy-
ment of this technology in the first place? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  has  deployed  97  Ex-
plosive  Trace  Portals  (ETPs)  to  37  of  our  Nation’s  airports  to  further  enhance  our 
ability to detect explosives. 

TSA  encountered  reliability  and  performance  issues  once  the  initial  roll-out  of 
these first-generation ETPs was completed, and the portals were subjected to a vari-
ety  of  environmental  issues.  TSA  is  working  with  one  of  the  vendors  (GE)  to  make 
improvements to these first-generation units. The information gathered and experi-
ence  gained  through  the  initial  deployment  of  these  units  has  provided  insight  into 
operational integration enhancements for the next generation of this technology. 

TSA  is  working  with  the  vendors  to  make  the  necessary  improvements  that  will 
enhance  the  performance  of  the  technology  before  additional  units  are  deployed. 
Once  the  improvements  are  made,  the  ETPs  will  be  evaluated  and  deployment  will 
continue. 

Additionally,  TSA  is  exploring  additional  technology  solutions  that  will  provide 
combined  weapons  and  explosives  detection  capabilities  in  the  form  of  whole  body 
imaging.

Question 8. How many more items are confiscated by TSO’s daily/weekly/monthly 

as a result of the ‘‘liquid ban’’ that TSA implemented last August? 

Answer.  The  Transportation  Security  Administration  (TSA)  does  not  confiscate 
liquids,  gels,  or  aerosols  at  passenger  screening  checkpoints.  When  items  that  are 
prohibited, but otherwise lawful, are identified at the checkpoint, Transportation Se-
curity  Officers  offer  passengers  the  choice  of  voluntarily  abandoning  the  items  or 
disposing of them by some other method. Examples of other disposition methods in-
clude  placing  the  items  in  checked  baggage  or  mailing  the  items  from  the  airport. 
TSA  does  not  record  the  number  of  passengers  abandoning  liquids  at  the  check-

point or the estimated volume of abandoned liquids.

ly basis? 

Question 9. How many weapons are confiscated by TSO’s on a daily/weekly/month-

Answer. A core mission of the Transportation Security Administration (TSA) is to 
prevent the introduction of items into the sterile areas of the Nation’s airports that 
could  be  used  for  deadly  or  dangerous  purposes.  When  the  screening  process  inter-
cepts  prohibited  items,  TSA  denies  the  items  entry  to  the  sterile  area;  we  do  not 
confiscate them. TSA considers any prohibited item (weapon or otherwise) discarded 
at  a  checkpoint  to  be  voluntarily  abandoned  property.  When  items  that  are  prohib-
ited, but otherwise lawful, are identified at the checkpoint, Transportation Security 
Officers offer passengers the choice of voluntarily abandoning the items or disposing 
of  the  items  by  some  other  method.  Examples  of  other  disposition  methods  include 
placing the items in checked baggage or mailing the items from the airport. Unlaw-
ful items are directed to the attention of local law enforcement for appropriate han-
dling. 

The following table shows incident records for dangerous/deadly items recorded in 
TSA’s  Performance  and  Results  Information  System  (PARIS)  in  Fiscal  Year  2006, 
sorted  as  requested.  TSA  field  operations  report  information  to  TSA  headquarters 
regarding a wide range of screening operations using this system.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Dangerous or Deadly Item Type 

Tot./FY06

Avg./Day 

Avg./Wk. 

Avg./Mo. 

55

Ammunition 
BB/Paint/Flare/Spear/Pellet Gun 
Bio/Chem/Radio Agent 
Bludgeon 
Cutting  Item  (knife,  razor,  box  cutter, 

saber, etc.) 

Explosive Device 
Firearms 
Fireworks 
Flare 
Fuel/Gasoline/Paint Thinner 
Hand Grenade (real and inert) 
Mace/Pepper Spray 
Martial Arts/Self Defense Item 
Part of Firearm 
Realistic Replica of Firearm 
Stun Gun/Shocking Device 

28
1
1
3

70
1
6
2
1
1
1
2
6
4
1
1

192
4
1
21

488
1
40
9
1
2
2
11
41
28
7
5

830
16
1
91

2,111
5
172
38
3
5
7
45
178
118
30
18

9,953
187
10
1,083

25,326
50
2,057
454
32
60
76
532
2,129
1,410
360
209

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  12:34 Oct 16, 2007 Jkt 035812 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\35812.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

